 We now have mice that were diabetic 4 months ago that no longer have it.
 Dr Ehud Ur, professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and chair of the Department of Clinical and Translational research at the Canadian diabetes Association,
 As some other experts have pointed out, he was skeptical about whether it was possible to cure diabetes, and pointed out that the findings were of no significance for people who were already suffering from type one diabetes.
 On Monday, Sara Danius, the permanent Secretary of the Swedish Academy's Nobel Prize Committee,
 Danius said, I have called his closest aide and sent him E-Mails and got very friendly replies.
 Rings Ceo Jamie Siminoff once said he founded the company after he couldn't hear his doorbell from his garage.
 He said he had built a Wifi doorbell.
 Siminoff said that sales had soared after his appearance on a 2013 episode of Shark Tank,
 In late 2017, Siminoff appeared on the Teleshopping channel, Qvc.
 Ring has also settled a lawsuit with the competing security firm, ADT Corporation.
 While a vaccine is able to reduce Ebola mortality,
 An antibody cocktail, ZMapp, initially looked promising, but formal studies showed that it had less of a benefit in terms of preventing deaths than had been hoped.
 In the PALM study, ZMapp served as a control,
 USA Gymnastics supports the letter from the United States Olympic Committee and accepts it as an absolute necessity for the Olympic family to stand up for a safe and healthy environment for all of our athletes.
 We agree with the statement of the USOC that it is in the best interest of our athletes, our teams and our sport to make meaningful changes within our organization rather than to decertify.
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent investigation that could bring to light the extent of the abuse that was so bravely described by the survivors of Larry Nassar and welcomes all necessary and appropriate changes.
 USA Gymnastics and the U S . Olympic Committee have the same goal of making gymnastics and other sports as safe as possible for the athletes,
 During the nineteen sixty s, Brzezinski worked as an advisor to John F . Kennedy and then to the administration of Lyndon B . Johnson.
 During the 1976 election, he advised Carter on foreign policy and then served from 1977 to 1981 as national security advisor.
 As national security advisor, he supported Carter in the diplomatic handling of world affairs such as the Camp David Accords of 1978, the normalization of relations between the United States and China in the late 1970s, the Iranian Revolution, which led to the Iran hostage crisis,
 The film starring Ryan Gosling and Emma stone has received nominations in all the main categories.
 Gosling and stone were nominated for best actor and best actress, respectively.
 Additional nominations include best film, direction, cinematography, costume design, editing, original music, production design, sound mixing, and original screenplay.
 Two songs from the film, Audition and City of Stars, were nominated for best original song.
 On the late Sunday, the President of the United States, Donald Trump,
 The announcement came after a telephone call from Trump to the Turkish President, Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 Turkey would carry out the monitoring of captured ISIS fighters whose return, the statement said, had been rejected by European countries.
 This not only confirms that at least some dinosaurs had feathers, a theory that's already quite widespread,
 Scientists say that the feathers on the top of this bird were chestnut-brown on the top and a light or carotine color on the bottom.
 The find also gives insights into the evolution of feathers in birds.
 Because the dinosaur feathers do not have a well-developed shaft, called the rachis,
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used for flight, but rather for temperature regulation or display,
 The researchers claimed that although this is the tail of a young dinosaur, the sample showed the feathers of an adult and showed no juvenile feathers.
 A car bomb detonated this morning at the Turkish police station in Gaziantep, killing two police officers and wounding over twenty other people.
 According to the governor's office, nineteen of the injured are police officers.
 The police said they were looking for a militant supporter of Daesh,
 They have found out that the sun operates on the same basic principles as other stars.
 To determine the Rossby number of a star, which is related to the plasma stream, the luminosity and the rotation are both included.
 The smaller the Rossby number, the less active the Star is in terms of Umpoling the magnetic field.
 During the journey, Iwasaki encountered many difficulties.
 He was robbed by Pirates, attacked by a rabid dog in Tibet, escaped a marriage in Nepal, and was arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard runs on the 2.4 GHz and 5.0 GHz frequencies.
 This allows it to be backwards compatible with 802.11a, 802.11b, and 802.11g,
 The speed of 802.11n is much faster than that of its predecessors, which had a maximum theoretical throughput of 600 Mbit.
 Duvall, who is married and has two grown children, has made no big impression on Miller,
 As he was asked for a comment, Miller said,
 We will strive to reduce the carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP
 He did not give a figure for the cuts, but said they would be made on the basis of China's economic performance.
 Hu encouraged developing countries to avoid the old path of first polluting and then cleaning up.
 He added, however, that they should not be asked to make commitments beyond their level of development, responsibility and ability.
 The study group on Iraq presented its report at 12:00 GMT.
 He warns that no one can guarantee that any approach in Iraq at this time will stop sectarian warfare,
 The report starts with a call for an open discussion and consensus building in the USA on a strategy for the Middle East.
 The report is extremely critical of almost every aspect of the current policy of the executive towards Iraq,
 The first of the 78 recommendations is that a new diplomatic initiative should be taken before the end of this year to secure Iraq's borders against hostile intervention and to restore diplomatic relations with its neighbors.
 The current Senator and Argentinian first lady, Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner,
 Kirchner announced her intention to run for President in the Argentine theatre, where she began her campaign for the Senate as a member of the Buenos Aires delegation.
 The trigger for the debate was a controversy over spending for the relief and reconstruction of New Orleans after Hurricane Katrina,
 The criticism of the Liberals on the reconstruction process has focused on the fact that contracts for the reconstruction were given to what were perceived as insiders in Washington.
 More than four million people came to Rome to attend the funeral.
 The number of people was so great that not everyone could get access to the funeral on St . Peter's square.
 Several large television screens were set up at various locations in Rome so that people could watch the ceremony.
 In many other cities in Italy and the rest of the world, especially in Poland, similar installations were set up and seen by many people.
 Historians have criticized the FBI's policies from earlier times,
 The Congress began in August 2005 with the funding of the anti-obscenity initiative and set out that the FBI must use 10 agents for the adult pornography.
 Robin Uthappa reached the highest score of the innings, 70 runs from only 41 balls,
 The middle order batsmen, Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid, showed good form and put on a partnership of 100 runs.
 But after losing the captain's wicket, India scored only 36 runs and lost 7 wickets,
 The U S . President, George W . Bush, arrived in Singapore on the morning of November sixteen and began a one-week tour of Asia.
 He was greeted by Wong Kan Seng, the deputy Prime Minister of Singapore, and spoke with Lee Hsien Loong, the Prime Minister of Singapore, about trade and terrorism issues.
 After a week of losses in the interim election, Bush told the audience about the expansion of trade in Asia.
 Premier Stephen Harper, after a 25-minute meeting with NDP leader Jack Layton,
 Layton had, during the meeting with the Prime Minister, called for changes to the Conservative party's environmental policy, and had called for a thorough and complete rewrite of the Conservative party's environmental policy.
 After the Federal Government stepped in to take over the funding of the Mersey hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, the state government and some members of the state parliament have criticised the move as a public relations stunt ahead of the Federal election in November.
 But Prime Minister John Howard said the move to provide the 45 million dollars was only to prevent the Tasmanian government from downgrading the hospitals.
 According to the latest bulletin,
 No major damage or injuries were reported from Tonga, although power was reportedly down for a time,
 Fourteen schools in Hawaii that are on or near the coasts were closed all day Wednesday, although the warnings had been lifted.
 U S . President George W . Bush welcomed the announcement.
 Bush spokesman Gordon Johndroe called the pledge a, quote, important step in the direction of verifiable denuclearization of the Korean peninsula.
 The tenth storm of the Atlantic hurricane season, which received a name, the Subtropical storm Jerry,
 At this time, the National Hurricane Center said that Jerry posed no threat to land.
 The U S . Army Corps of engineers estimated that 6 inches of rain could cause the already damaged dams to break.
 The Ninth Ward, which was flooded up to twenty feet during Hurricane Katrina, is currently experiencing water up to its knees,
 On a 100 foot long section, water runs over the dam.
 The Commons-Administrator Adam Cuerden expressed his disappointment with the distances when he talked with Wikinews last month.
 He has, in a sense, lied to us from the beginning,
 The irritation in the community led to the current efforts to draft a policy regarding sexual content for the Website, which hosts millions of openly licensed media.
 The work was mostly theoretical, but the program was written to simulate observations that were made from the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 The effect the team was looking for would be caused by tidal forces between the dark matter of the Galaxy and the dark matter of the Milky way.
 Just as the moon pulls the earth and causes the tides,
 The scientists came to the conclusion that dark matter acts on other dark matter in the same way that normal matter acts on normal matter.
 This theory suggests that most of the dark matter is in a sort of halo around a Galaxy,
 Television reports show white smoke coming out of the building.
 The local authorities are urging people in the vicinity of the plant to stay indoors,
 According to Japan's nuclear watchdog, radioactive cobalt and iodine were found at the plant.
 The authorities speculate that this could indicate that containers with uranium power could have been leaking.
 The extremely drug-resistant tuberculosis, or XDR-TB, was discovered by Dr . Tony Moll in the KwaZulu-Natal region of South Africa.
 In an interview, he said the new variant is, quote, extremely alarming and alarming because of the very high death rate.
 Some patients may have been infected in the hospital, says Dr Moll, and at least two were medical staff.
 Within a year, an infected person can infect 10 to 15 close contacts.
 Despite this, the proportion of XDR-TB in the total group of people with TB is still low,
 The two satellites, both weighing over 1,000 pounds, collided 491 miles above the earth at a speed of about 17,500 miles per hour.
 Scientists say the explosion caused by the collision was massive.
 They are still trying to find out how extensive the collision was and how the earth will be affected.
 The strategic command of the United States' defense Department finds the wreckage.
 The results of the plotting analysis are published on a public Website.
 A doctor who worked at a children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, is charged with murder after her dead mother was found in the trunk of her car on Wednesday, authorities in Ohio said.
 Dr . Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found lying on the ground in T-shirt and underwear,
 She led the officers to her black Oldsmobile Intrigue, which was 500 feet away.
 There, they found the body of Saroja Balasubramanian, 53, under blood-soaked blankets.
 The police said the body had been there for about a day.
 The first cases of the disease this season were reported at the end of July.
 The disease is transmitted by pigs and then transmitted to humans through mosquitoes.
 The outbreak of the disease led the Indian government to appoint pig hunters in heavily affected areas,
 The government has also promised several million vials of vaccine against brain fever,
 Plans for vaccines that were to be delivered to the historically hardest hit areas were delayed due to lack of funding and low priority setting compared to other diseases.
 In 1956, Słonia went to Sweden, where he worked for three years in the Swedish post office,
 He produced over 1,000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries.
 The quality and precision of his work are so highly regarded that his name is one of the very few commonly known names in the field of philately.
 His one thousandth stamp, from the year two thousand,
 He was also involved in the design of many other currencies, including the current portraits of the Canadian five and one hundred dollar banknotes.
 After the accident, Gibson was taken to a hospital,
 The LKW driver, who is 64 years old, was not injured in the accident.
 The car itself was removed from the scene of the accident at around 12:00 GMT on the same day.
 A person who worked in a workshop near the accident site said,
 They all ran back to the scene of the accident.
 Other topics on the agenda in Bali are the rescue of the world's remaining forests and the sharing of technology to help the developing countries grow in a less environmentally damaging way.
 The United Nations are also hoping to set up a fund to help the countries affected by global warming to cope with the effects.
 The money could be used for flood-proof housing, better water management and crop diversification.
 Fluke wrote that the efforts of some, women who wanted to speak about women's health,
 She came to this conclusion based on the numerous positive comments and encouragement she received from both men and women who urged that contraceptives should be seen as a medical necessity.
 When the fighting stopped after the transport of the wounded to the hospital,
 The negotiators tried to ease the situation, but the demands of the inmates are unclear.
 Between 22:00 and 11:00 a.m. MDT, a fire was set by the inmates in the courtyard.
 Soon, police officers, who were wearing protective gear, entered the premises and pushed the residents into a corner with tear gas.
 The fire was finally put out at 23:35.
 Once the dam was built in 1963, the seasonal floods that used to distribute sediments in the river came to a halt.
 This sediment was needed to form sandbars and beaches that served as Habitats for wildlife.
 Two fish species have become extinct and two others are at risk of becoming extinct, including the Gila cypha.
 The authorities hope that the rise in the water level after the flood will be enough to restore eroded sandbanks downstream, although it is only a few feet.
 No tsunami warning was issued and according to the Jakarta Geophysics agency,
 Although there was no tsunami danger, the residents of the town panicked and began to evacuate their businesses and homes.
 Although Winfrey shed tears at her departure, she assured her fans that she would be back.
 This will not be a farewell. This is the end of one chapter and the beginning of a new chapter.
 The end results of the Presidential and Parliamentary elections in Namibia have indicated that the incumbent President, Hifikepunye Pohamba,
 The ruling party, the South West Africa people's Organisation, SWAPO,
 Troops from the coalition and Afghan forces moved into the area to secure the site, and other coalition aircraft were sent to support the operation.
 The crash occurred high up in hilly terrain, and it is suspected that it was the result of hostile fire.
 The efforts to find the crash site are hampered by bad weather and rough terrain.
 The medical welfare organization, Medecines Sans Frontieres, and the world health organization,
 Richard Veerman, spokesperson for doctors without borders, said,
 The games started at 10:00 a M . in great weather and, except for some light drizzle in the morning, which soon cleared,
 South Africa, the top-ranked team in the tournament, started with a comfortable 26:00 win against Zambia, the fifth-ranked team.
 Although the team definitely looked rusty against their Southern sisters,
 Their disciplined defense, ball control and excellent teamwork made it clear that this was the team that had to be defeated.
 Officials from the city of Amsterdam and the Anne Frank museum say the tree is infected with a fungus and is a public health hazard,
 It was scheduled to be held on Tuesday, but was postponed due to an emergency court ruling.
 All of the cave entrances, also called the seven sisters, have a diameter of at least 100 to 250 meters.
 Infrared images show temperature differences between night and day, which suggest that they are probably caves.
 They are colder during the day and warmer at night.
 Their thermal behavior is not as even as the larger caves on earth, which often have a fairly constant temperature,
 In France, voting is traditionally a low-tech experience: the voter isolates himself in a booth and puts a preprinted slip of paper,
 Once the officials have verified the identity of the voter,
 The French election law lays out the process in a fairly strict way.
 Since 1988, ballot boxes have had to be transparent so that voters and observers can see that no ballot envelopes are present at the beginning of the vote,
 The candidates can send representatives to witness every part of the process, and the votes are counted by volunteers under strict supervision and special procedures.
 The ASUS Eee PC, previously brought to the market based on Spar and Functionality factors,
 But the consumer market for Laptop-Computers will be radically changed after ASUS was awarded the Taiwan Sustainable Award 2007 by the Republic of China's
 The Website of the station describes the show as, quote, old-fashioned radio theater with a new and eerie, weird, and creepy interpretation.
 In their early days, the show was only broadcast on the old-fashioned Internet radio site Toginet radio,
 In late 2015, TogiNet founded the secondary station AstroNet radio.
 The show originally had local amateur Synchro-Speakers from East Texas.
 Reports say that the looting went on all night, while police officers showed no presence on the streets of Bishkek.
 According to the description of an observer, Bishkek fell into a state of anarchy as gangs of people roamed the streets and looted consumer goods.
 Several residents of Bishkek blamed the lawlessness on the demonstrators from the South.
 South Africa beat the All Blacks of New Zealand in a Rugby Union match at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in the South African town of Rustenburg.
 The final score was a win by one point,
 For the Springboks, it ended a five game losing streak.
 It was the last game for the All Blacks, who had won the trophy two weeks earlier.
 The final will be played next week at the Ellis Park Stadium in Johannesburg,
 A moderate earthquake hit the West of Montana at 22:08 on Monday.
 There were no immediate reports of damage to the United States Geological Survey and its National earthquake information center.
 The center of the earthquake was about twenty miles north-northeast of Dillon and about sixty miles south of Butte.
 It has been confirmed that the deadly H5N1 bird flu virus has infected a wild duck found dead Monday in a marshy area near Lyon in eastern France.
 France is the seventh country in the European Union to be hit by the virus, after Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 Suspected cases of H5N1 in Croatia and Denmark remain unconfirmed.
 Chambers sued God for the widespread death, destruction, and terrorization of many millions of earthly inhabitants.
 Chambers, an Agnostic, argues that his complaint is frivolous and that anyone can sue anyone.
 The story, which is told in the French opera by Camille Saint-Saens, is about an artist,
 And so the actors on the stage are smoking Cannabis joints and the theater itself is encouraging the audience to do the same.
 The former Speaker of the House, Newt Gingrich, the Texas governor, Rick Perry, and the Congresswoman, Michele Bachmann,
 After the results were in, Gingrich praised Santorum, but found harsh words for Romney, in whose name negative campaign ads had been run in Iowa against Gingrich.
 Perry stated, I will return to Texas to evaluate the outcome of today's vote and to decide if there is a path forward for me in this race.
 Bachmann, who had won the Ames-Straw-Poll in August, decided to end her campaign.
 The photographer was taken to the Ronald Reagan UCLA medical center, where he subsequently died.
 According to reports, he was in his 20s at the time . In a statement, Bieber said,
 The photographer stopped his vehicle on the other side of Sepulveda Boulevard and attempted to take photographs of the traffic stop before he crossed the street and continued on his way.
 According to police, the driver of the vehicle that hit the photographer will probably not be charged.
 Since only eighteen medals are available per day, it has not had a number of countries on the podium.
 In addition to the Netherlands, where Anna Jochemsen placed ninth in the women's super G, and Finland with Katja Saarinen, who placed tenth in the same event.
 The Australian Mitchell Gourley was eleventh in the standing Super-G, and the Czech Oldrich Jelinek was sixteenth in the seated Super-G.
 The Mexican Arly Velasquez came in as the fifteenth in the men's Super-G.
 The visually impaired Polish skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska finished in the Super-G in thirteenth place.
 The UN peacekeepers who arrived in Haiti after the earthquake of 2010 are blamed for the spread of the disease that broke out near the camp.
 According to the complaint, the waste from the UN camp was not properly cleaned, which led to bacteria entering the Artibonit River, one of the largest rivers in Haiti.
 Before the arrival of the troops, no problems had been reported in Haiti since the 1800s.
 The Haitian Institute for justice and democracy has referred to independent studies that suggest that the Nepalese UN peacekeeping battalion may have inadvertently brought the disease to Haiti.
 Danielle Lantagne, a UN expert on the disease, said the outbreak was likely caused by the blue helmets.
 Hamilton confirmed that the Howard University hospital had taken the patient in stable condition.
 The patient had been in Nigeria, where some cases of Ebola had been reported.
 The hospital followed protocols to prevent the infection of others, including the separation of the patient from others.
 Before the Simpsons, Simon had worked on several shows in various roles.
 In the nineteen eighty s, he worked on shows like taxi, cheers, and the tracey Ullman show.
 In two thousand and nine, he helped Brooks and Groening create the Simpsons and was responsible for the hiring of the show's first writing team.
 Although he left the show in 1993, he retained the title of chief producer and received further licensing fees in the double-digit millions.
 The Chinese news agency Xinhua had previously reported the planned hijacking of an airplane.
 Later reports said the plane had received a bomb threat and had been diverted to Kandahar, where it landed.
 The first reports say that the plane was diverted back to Afghanistan after it was refused permission to land in Urumqi.
 Air crashes are common in Iran, which has an outdated fleet that is poorly maintained for both civilian and military use.
 International sanctions have meant that no new planes can be bought.
 Three people were killed and three others were injured in a helicopter crash at the beginning of the week.
 Last month, Iran suffered its worst airplane crash in years,
 In the same month, another passenger plane crashed at the end of a runway in Mashhad,
 Aerosmith have canceled the remaining concerts of their tour.
 The rock band was scheduled to tour through the United States and Canada by the sixteenth of September.
 After the frontman Steven Tyler injured himself during a performance on the fifth of August,
 Murray lost the first set in the tiebreak after both men had held every single service game in the set.
 Del Potro had an early advantage in the second set, but even this time a tiebreak was necessary after the score reached 6-6.
 Potros shoulder was treated in the meantime, but he was able to return to the field.
 The program began at 20:30 local time,
 Famous singers from all over the country presented Bhajans, devotional songs, to Shri Shyam's feet.
 The singer Sanju Sharma opened the evening, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary, who also performed the Chhappan Bhog Bhajan,
 Then Lakkha Singh took over the leadership of the Bhajans.
 Baba Shyam were served 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog,
 Lakkha Singh also presented the Chhappan Bhog Bhajan, accompanied by the singer Raju Khandelwal.
 At the keynote presentation of the Tokyo Game Show on Thursday, Nintendo President Satoru Iwata revealed the Controller design for the company's new Nintendo Revolution Console.
 Similar to a TV remote, the Controller uses two sensors, which are placed near the user's television to triangulate the user's position in three-dimensional space.
 This will allow players to control actions and movements in Video games by moving the device in the air.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and had to retire from the race shortly after the start.
 His teammate led most of the race, but ended up second, probably because of a badly jammed right front tire.
 Shortly after Alonso, Michael also ended his race due to damage to the suspension from the numerous fights during the race.
 She is very sweet and she can also sing quite well,
 I was moved to tears at every rehearsal.
 Approximately three minutes after takeoff, a cockpit camera showed that numerous pieces of insulating foam had broken off from the fuel tank.
 We're not assuming that they damaged the shuttle in any way.
 N . Wayne Hale, Jr, the head of NASA's shuttle program, said that the foam had fallen off by the time that they were concerned about it.
 After five minutes, the wind reached 70 km per hour,
 I have my sister and her friend lost, and on my way were two disabled people in a wheelchair,
 The NHK also reported that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating normally.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Co. reported that the earthquake had no effect and that the reactors number one and two of the Shika nuclear power plant had been shut down.
 It is reported that around 9,400 houses in the region have no water and around 100 have no electricity.
 Some roads were damaged and railroad service in the affected areas was disrupted, and the Noto airport in Ishikawa Prefecture remains closed.
 A bomb exploded in front of the governor's office.
 Three more bombs detonated within two hours near government buildings.
 According to some reports, the official death toll is eight, and official reports confirm that up to 30 people were injured.
 Both Cyanuric acid and Melamine were found in urine samples from pets that had died after eating contaminated pet food.
 The two compounds react with each other and form crystals that, according to the researchers at the University,
 The researchers discovered crystals in the cat's urine that had been formed by the addition of Melamine and Cyanuric acid.
 The composition of these crystals is consistent with the composition found in the urine of affected pets when compared by infrared spectroscopy.
 I do not know if you were aware of this, but most of the goods from Central America came into our country duty free.
 Eighty percent of our goods were taxed in the central American countries. We are looking after you.
 That seemed to me not to be fair, and it was certainly not fair.
 I only say to people that we want to be treated the same as we treat other people.
 The California governor Arnold Schwarzenegger signed a bill that prohibits the sale or rental of Video games that contain violence to minors.
 The bill would require that games sold in the state of California be labeled with a sticker bearing the number 18,
 The director of public prosecutions, Kier Starmer,
 Huhne has resigned and will be replaced in the cabinet by the MP Ed Davey, and it is expected that the MP Norman Lamb will take over the job of the economy Minister that Davey is currently vacating.
 Huhne and Pryce are due to appear before the Westminster Magistrates' Court on 16 February.
 The dead were Nicholas Alden, 25, and Zachary Cuddeback, 21. Cuddeback is the driver.
 Edgar Veguilla suffered wounds to his arm and jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider needed reconstructive surgery for his face.
 The weapon of Uka had a safety catch when he aimed it at the head of a fifth man, Schneider has been left with chronic pain, is blind in one eye, and has had part of his skull reconstructed with titanium.
 Schneider said, via a Video link from a base of the U S . Air Force in his home country.
 Carpanedo competed in two individual races beyond the event on Wednesday,
 Their first event was the slalom, in which they were eliminated in their first run.
 In the other race, the giant slalom, she finished in the tenth place in the women's group with a combined time of 4:41.30,
 Four skiers of the Krückenskifahren came not to the goal, and 45 of the total of 117 skiers in the giant slalom could not place themselves in the race.
 The police in Madhya Pradesh have recovered the stolen laptop and mobile phone.
 The deputy Inspector General, D . K . Arya, said,
 The names of the accused are Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanja, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar, and Vishnu Kanjar.
 The police chief, Chandra Shekhar Solanki, said the accused had appeared in court with their faces covered.
 Although three people were in the house when the car crashed in,
 The driver, however, sustained serious head injuries.
 The road on which the accident had occurred was temporarily closed while the emergency services freed the driver from the red Audi TT.
 He was first taken to the James Paget hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was subsequently transferred to Addenbrooke's hospital in Cambridge.
 Adekoya was in the meantime charged with the murder of her son at Edinburgh Sheriff Court.
 She is in custody until the trial and the hearing, but the statements of the witnesses could be falsified,
 This is common practice in the rest of Britain, but the Scottish justice system works differently, and the courts have deemed the publication of the photos as potentially harmful.
 Professor Pamela Ferguson from the University of Dundee remarks,
 The crown prosecution service, which is leading the prosecution, has indicated to journalists that at least until the charges are laid,
 According to the Leak, the document is about the border dispute, in which the Palestinians demand a return to the status quo before the six day war of 1967.
 Other topics that are allegedly covered include the future of Jerusalem, which is sacred to both nations, and the problem of the Jordan Valley.
 Israel demands a military presence in the Jordan Valley for ten years after the signing of the agreement, while the Palestinian authority wants such a presence only for five years.
 The guards of the accompanying experiment to contain the plague should be closely watched by the guards,
 In the context of a partnership between NPWS and the Sporting Shooters Association of Australia,
 According to Mick O'Flynn, the business manager of Park Conservation and Heritage in the NPWS,
 Martelly has sworn in a new provisional electoral Council with nine members.
 It is Martelly's fifth CEP within four years.
 Last month, a Presidency Commission recommended the resignation of the previous Ceps as part of a package of measures to steer the country towards new elections.
 The Commission was Martelly's response to the widespread regime-critical protests that began in October.
 The trigger for the sometimes violent protests was the failure to hold elections, some of which had been scheduled for 2011.
 Over 60 cases of overheating have been reported, resulting in six fires and four people suffering minor burns.
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry said it had been notified of 27 incidents involving the devices.
 Last week, METI announced that it had been notified by apple of an additional thirty four cases of overheating,
 The Ministry responded by describing the delay as a real pity.
 The earthquake struck at 07:19 local time on Friday.
 The National Guard said there were no reports of damage in the northern Marianas.
 The Pacific Tsunami Warning center also said there were no indications of a tsunami.
 A former Philippine police officer has taken tourists from Hong Kong as hostages by hijacking their bus in Manila, the Philippines' capital.
 Rolando Mendoza shot the tourists with his M16 rifle.
 Several hostages have been rescued and there are at least six confirmed deaths.
 Six hostages, including the children and the elderly, were released early, along with the Filipino photographers.
 The photographers took the place of an older woman when she had to go to the toilet,
 Liggins followed in his father's footsteps and pursued a medical career.
 He trained as a midwife and took up a job in 1959 at the National women's hospital in Auckland.
 During his time in the hospital, Liggins began to study premature labour in his spare time.
 His research showed that the use of a hormone accelerated the lung maturation of the Foetus.
 Xinhua reported that investigators of the government on Wednesday recovered two black box flight recorders.
 Fellow wrestlers also paid tribute to Luna.
 And the first woman to manage a major league team.
 Dustin Runnels commented, Luna was as crazy as me,
 Of the 1,400 people who were surveyed before the 2010 Federal elections, the proportion of those who were opposed to Australia becoming a Republic has increased by 8 per cent since 2008.
 The acting Prime Minister, Julia Gillard, stated during the election campaign for the Federal election in two thousand and ten that in her opinion,
 Thirty four percent of those surveyed agree with this view and want Elizabeth II to be the last Australian monarch.
 Twenty nine percent of those surveyed said Australia should become a Republic as soon as possible, while thirty one percent said Australia should never become a Republic.
 The gold medalist at the Olympic games should have competed in the 100 m and 200 m freestyle as well as in three relays,
 He was unable to take the required medication to overcome his pain because it was banned at the Commonwealth games.
 On January twenty five, Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer science professor at the University of central Missouri, discovered the largest known prime number.
 A number of people have confirmed the discovery using different hardware and software at the beginning of February, and on Tuesday, it was announced.
 Comets may have been a source of water for the earth, along with organic matter that can form proteins and make life possible.
 Because comets have been hitting the earth for a long time,
 Cuomo, 53, took office earlier this year and signed a bill last month to legalize same-sex marriage.
 He described the rumors as political nonsense and nonsense.
 It is speculated that he may run for the office of President in 2016.
 NextGen is a system the FAA claims would allow planes to fly shorter routes and save millions of gallons of fuel each year,
 It relies on satellite-based technology instead of the older technology based on ground radar,
 No additional transportation will be provided, and no trains will stop at Wembley.
 With the concern over lack of transportation growing, there was a growing concern that the game would have to be played without the fans of the team.
 A study published Thursday in the Journal science reported the emergence of a new bird species on the Ecuadorian Galapagos Islands.
 Researchers at Princeton University in the United States and at Uppsala University in Sweden reported that the new species had developed within only two generations,
 Gold can be rolled into various shapes.
 It can be drawn into a thin wire, which can be twisted and braided, or it can be hammered or rolled into sheets.
 It can be made very thin and glued to other metal,
 And this is the indicator that we're going to use to measure the pH of the red cabbage juice.
 The Kohl's juice changes its color depending on how sour or basic the chemical is.
 The pH level indicates the amount of hydrogen ions present in the tested chemicals.
 Hydrogen ions are protons to which their electrons have been removed.
 Mix the two dry powders together and then form them into a ball with clean, wet hands.
 The moisture on your hands reacts with the outer layers, which feels kind of weird, and it creates a kind of a protective layer.
 The cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-Daro had in almost every house a flushing toilet,
 And the remains of sewage systems were found in the houses of the Minoan cities of Crete and Santorini in Greece.
 Also in ancient Egypt, Persia, and China, there were toilets.
 When you call someone who is thousands of miles away, you use a satellite.
 The satellite in space receives the call and then reflects it back down almost immediately.
 The satellite was launched into space by a rocket, and scientists use telescopes in space because the earth's atmosphere distorts our light and our view somewhat.
 It takes a massive rocket with a height of over one hundred feet to shoot a satellite or a telescope into space.
 The bicycle has changed the world in an incredible way . The greatest service the bicycle has rendered us is a very simple and a very quicker transportation.
 It has brought us the railroad, the automobile, and many other means of transportation.
 Among them are medium-sized cats that eat medium-sized prey, from rabbits to antelopes and deer.
 Finally, there are many small cats, including feral cats,
 The secret of their success is the concept of the niche, a special task that each cat has and that ensures that they do not compete with others.
 Lions are the most social of cats, living in large groups called prides.
 The packs consist of one to three adult males and up to thirty females and young.
 Women have a close relationship with each other when they live in a large family with sisters and daughters.
 Lions are very similar to wolves or dogs in their behavior,
 As a versatile athlete, the tiger can climb, although not very well, swim, jump great distances, and pull with the strength of a strong man.
 The tiger is in the same group as lions, leopards and jaguars,
 The roar of the tiger is not as full and resonant as the full-throated roar of the lion,
 Ocelots eat small animals, and if they can, they will steal monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds.
 Scientists think that Ocelots use their sense of smell to track and detect prey that they have been sniffing at on the ground.
 They can see very well in the dark with night vision and can move around unseen.
 If a small group of organisms is separated from the main population from which it came,
 And the new environment has other resources and other competitors, so the new population needs different features or adaptations in order to be a strong competitor than what it previously needed.
 The original population has not changed at all,
 Over time, the new population begins to adapt to its new environment, and then it looks less and less like the other population.
 After thousands or even millions of years, two populations may look so different that they cannot be assigned to the same species.
 This is called speciation, which simply means the creation of new species.
 Plants generate oxygen for people to breathe in and absorb the carbon dioxide that people breathe out.
 Plants produce their food through Photosynthesis, and they also give shade.
 We build our houses from plants and make our clothes from plants.
 The Mosasaurus was the biggest predator of its time, so it feared nothing but other Mosasaurus.
 His long fangs were furnished with more than seventy sharp teeth,
 We don't know for sure, but he may have had a forked tongue, he may have eaten turtles, large fish, other Mosasaurs, and may have been a cannibal.
 He also grabbed everything that came into the water, even a large dinosaur like the T . Rex.
 While the majority of their foods will be familiar to us, the Romans had their share of unusual or bizarre Festive meals, including wild boar, peacock, snails, and a kind of rodent called a Siebenschläfer.
 Another difference was that the poor people and the women ate their food sitting down, while the rich men preferred to have their meals on the side,
 The courts of old Rome could not include any foods that came from the Americas or Asia in later centuries.
 They had no corn, no tomatoes, no potatoes, no cacao,
 The Babylonians built a temple for each of their gods, which was considered the House of the God.
 They brought sacrifices to the gods and the priests tried to please the will of the gods through ceremonies and festivals.
 Each temple had an open courtyard and then an inner Altar-Room, which only priests were allowed to enter.
 Sometimes, special pyramid-shaped towers, called Zikkurats, were built as part of the temple.
 The top of the tower was a special sanctuary for the god.
 In the warm climate of the Middle East, houses did not have such great importance.
 The greater part of the life of the Hebrew family played itself out in the open air.
 The women cooked in the yard, and shops were simply open shops with stone used for building.
 In the land of Canaan, there were no large forests, so wood was extremely expensive.
 Greenland was sparsely populated, and in the old Norse Sagas it is said that Erik the Red was banished from Iceland for murder.
 But, independent of his discovery, Eskimo tribes were already living there at that time.
 Although all the countries were Scandinavian, there were many differences between the people, the Kings, the customs, and the history of Denmark, Sweden, Norway, and Iceland.
 If you've seen the movie, the Mummy, you might think that a treasure map was drawn on the back of the Declaration of Independence.
 Although on the back of the paper is written something, it is not a treasure map.
 On the back of the Declaration of Independence, the words, original Declaration of Independence, dated July 4, 1776,
 No one knows for sure who wrote it, but it is known that the great parchment document, which is 29¾ inches by 24½ inches,
 It is possible, therefore, that the mark was simply added as a marker.
 The landing at D-Day and the fighting that followed liberated the North of France, but the South was still not free.
 He was dominated by the Vichy French, who had signed a peace treaty with the Germans in 1940 and were working with the invaders,
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies invaded Southern France,
 After only two weeks, the Americans and the French liberation forces had liberated the South of France and turned their attention to Germany.
 A civilization is a distinctive culture, shared by a significant group of people who live and work together,
 The word civilization comes from the Latin word civilis, which means civil, related to the Latin word civis, which means citizen,
 City-States are the precursors of nations, a civilized culture implies the transmission of knowledge over several generations,
 Smaller cultures often disappear without leaving relevant historical records and fail to be recognized as a true civilization.
 During the revolutionary war, the thirteen States,
 The Congress was not empowered to levy taxes, and since there was neither a national executive nor a national judiciary,
 He had no power to set aside tax laws and tariffs between the States.
 The articles required the unanimous consent of all the States before they could be changed, and the States took the central government so little seriously that their representatives were often absent.
 The Italian national football team is, along with the German national football team, the second most successful national football team in the world,
 Among the most popular sports are football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, Rugby, Cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey and Formula One motor racing.
 Winter sports are most popular in the northern regions, and Italians compete in international and Olympic games.
 Japan has about 7,000 Islands, making it the seventh largest Island country in the world.
 Because of the cluster of Islands, Japan is often geographically referred to as an Archipelago.
 The beginning of Taiwan goes back to the fifteenth century, when European sailors passed by and documented the name of the island as Ilha Formosa, or beautiful Island.
 1624, the Dutch East India company established a settlement in the Southwest of Taiwan,
 In the year 1683, the Qing dynasty's forces took control of Taiwan's Western and northern coastal regions,
 In 1895, after the defeat in the first Sino-Japanese war,
 Machu Picchu consists mainly of three buildings, namely the Intihuatana, the sun temple, and the room of the three windows.
 Most of the buildings at the edges of the complex have been rebuilt to give tourists a better idea of how they originally looked.
 By the time of the twentieth century,
 For example, the most widely used film format is 35 mm, which is the dominant film size at the end of the analog film era.
 It is still produced today, but even more importantly, its image format has been adopted by the image sensor formats of Digital cameras.
 The so-called 35 mm film actually measures 36 mm in width and 24 mm in height.
 The aspect ratio of this format, divided by twelve to get the simplest integer ratio, is therefore called 3:2.
 Many common formats, such as the APS format family,
 The much-maligned and often scoffed at third rule is a simple guideline that creates dynamism and at the same time,
 It says that the intersection of the lines that divide a picture vertically and horizontally is the most effective place for the main motif.
 In this period of European history, the rich and powerful Catholic Church was on trial.
 For over a thousand years, the Christian religion had held the European States together, despite different languages and customs.
 His power extended to every one, from the King to the humblest peasant.
 One of the important Christian beliefs is that wealth is to be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and that it is the money of the churches that is used for this very purpose.
 The central power of the church had been in Rome for more than a thousand years, and this concentration of power and wealth led many to question whether this principle had been followed.
 Soon after the outbreak of hostilities, Britain initiated a naval blockade of Germany.
 The strategy proved effective, as it cut off the country from vital military and civilian supplies, although this blockade was in violation of the generally recognized international law codified by a number of international agreements over the last two centuries.
 Britain mined international waters to prevent ships from entering whole seas, which was a danger to even neutral ships.
 Because the response to this tactic was limited, Germany expected a similar response to its unrestricted U-Boat warfare.
 In the nineteen twenty s, pacifism and isolation were the prevailing attitudes of most citizens and countries.
 After the experience of the horrors and atrocities of the first World War,
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States of America,
 He came to the U S . with 4 cents in his pocket, a book of poems, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor,
 The old China had a unique method of displaying different eras,
 Between the individual dynasties, there were also unstable periods of divided provinces, the best-known of which was the period of the three kingdoms,
 In these times, there were bitter wars among many nobles who were fighting for the throne.
 The time of the three kingdoms was one of the bloodiest periods in the history of ancient China.
 There are a lot of social and political effects such as the use of the metric system, a move away from absolute Monarchy to Republicanism and nationalism,
 Also, after the revolution, all professions were open to all male applicants, so that the most ambitious and the best could succeed.
 The same is true of the military, because instead of being based on class,
 The French Revolution also inspired many oppressed people in other countries to start their own revolutions.
 Mohammed was very interested in things that went beyond this everyday life, and he often visited a cave known as Hira, on the mountain of Nur,
 The cave itself has outlived the times and offers a vivid picture of Muhammad's spiritual inclinations.
 The cave is on the top of one of the mountains north of Mecca and is completely isolated from the rest of the world.
 It's not easy to find, even though you know it's there, because once you're inside the cave,
 You see nothing but the clear, beautiful sky and the numerous surrounding mountains from the interior of the cave.
 The only one of the seven wonders of the world that still stands today is the Cheops pyramid.
 Built in the third century B . C . by the Egyptians, the Cheops Pyramid is one of many large pyramid structures built to honor deceased Pharaohs.
 The Giza plateau or Giza necropolis in the Egyptian valley of the dead includes several pyramids,
 The great pyramid was built in honor of Pharaoh Cheops and many of the smaller pyramids, tombs and temples were built in honor of Cheops's wives and family members.
 The upward facing arrow is a V and the downward facing arrow is a Klammer or a square with the bottom line missing.
 Upwards means that you start at the top and should push the bow downwards means that you start at the frog and should push the bow down.
 The brush is used to apply the paint,
 You can add your own pencil markings if you'd like, but please remember that the printed page numbers are there for a reason.
 The panicked King Louis the fourteenth, Queen Marie-Antoinette, their two small children,
 They traveled back to Paris, surrounded by a screaming mob of people who were shouting threats against the King and the queen.
 The mob forced the King and the queen to open the windows of their carriages wide.
 At one point, a member of the angry crowd swung the head of a King's guard, killed in Versailles, before the eyes of the shocked queen.
 The war expenses of the U S . imperialists in conquering the Philippines were borne by the Filipino people themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the U S . colonial regime in order to cover most of the expenses, and the interest on the loans flowed through the Wall Street banks.
 And the super profits, which were derived from the ongoing exploitation of the Philippine people,
 To understand the Templars, one must understand the context that led to the foundation of the order.
 The period of time in which the events took place is commonly referred to as the high Middle Ages,
 The early Middle Ages were followed by the high Middle Ages, which in turn were followed by the late Middle Ages,
 Technological determinism is a term that encompasses a wide range of ideas, from the technology push or the technological imperative,
 The most common interpretations of technological determinism share two general ideas, one, that the development of technology itself follows a path that is largely beyond cultural or political influence,
 One could argue that the automobile has brought with it the development of roads.
 However, a nationwide road network is economically unsustainable for only a small number of cars,
 The widespread ownership of automobiles also leads to a higher number of accidents on the roads, which in turn leads to the invention of new techniques in the health care industry to repair damaged bodies.
 The Romanticism had a strong, culturally deterministic element,
 In the context of romanticism, it is the geography that shaped individuals,
 So, as Paris is known as the fashion capital of the world today,
 His fame as a center of luxury began around 400 and lasted until around 1100.
 His status declined in the course of the twelfth century, which was mainly due to the fact that the crusaders had returned with gifts such as silk and spices, which were regarded as more valuable than the offerings of the Byzantine markets.
 At this time, the title of the world's fashion capital also moved from Constantinople to Paris.
 The Gothic style reached its height in the period between the 10th and 11th and the 14th centuries.
 At the beginning, the clothing was heavily influenced by the culture of Byzantium in the East.
 But in the West, the styles are 25 to 30 years behind.
 Towards the end of the Middle Ages, a new style began to develop in Western Europe.
 Farming is agriculture that aims to produce just enough food to meet the needs of the farmer and his or her family.
 The subsistence economy is a simple, often biological, form of agriculture that uses saved, locally grown seed and combines it with crop rotation or other relatively simple techniques to maximize the yield.
 In the past, most farmers have practised subsistence farming, and in many developing countries, that is still the case.
 Subcultures bring together like-minded people who feel alienated from mainstream society and allow them to develop a sense of identity.
 Subcultures can be distinguished from other Subcultures based on age, ethnicity, class, location, and or gender.
 The characteristics that define a Subculture may be linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, or geographic in nature, or a combination of these.
 Members of a Subculture often signal their membership through an unmistakable and symbolic style, which includes fashion, habits, and jargon.
 One of the most common methods of illustrating the importance of socialization is to rely on the few unfortunate cases of children who have been neglected, abused, or purposely mistreated by adults during their childhood.
 Some of these children were kept by humans, usually their own parents,
 Wolf children may have experienced severe child abuse or traumatic experiences before they were abandoned or ran away.
 Some were raised by animals, some were raised in the wild.
 When it is completely raised by animals, the wild child shows behavioral patterns,
 While project-based learning should make the learning process easier and more interesting, Scaffolding goes one step further.
 Scaffolding is not a learning method, but rather a support that assists individuals in a new learning situation, such as using a new computer program or beginning a new project.
 Structures can be both virtual and real . In other words, a teacher is a form of a structure, but so is the little little man in Microsoft office.
 Virtual help is built into the software and is supposed to question,
 Children are placed in foster care for a variety of reasons, ranging from neglect to abuse,
 No child should be forced to grow up in an environment that is not caring, loving and education oriented, but many are.
 For us, the system of foster care is a piece of security for these children.
 Our foster care system is supposed to provide a safe home, loving caregivers, a stable education, and reliable health care.
 The care home is supposed to cover all the needs that they didn't get in the home that they were taken out of.
 The Internet connects both elements of mass communication,
 The specificities of the Internet have led to additional dimensions in terms of the benefit and reward approach.
 For example, learning and socialization are cited as important motivations for Internet use.
 And personal engagement and ongoing relationships were also identified as new motivational aspects by Eighmey and McCord,
 The use of Video recordings led to important insights for the interpretation of Microexpressions,
 In particular, it is claimed that one can detect whether someone is lying by correctly interpreting minimal changes in the person's facial expression.
 In his article the President's speech, Oliver Sacks showed how people who have lost the ability to speak because of a brain injury can still judge the honesty of other people correctly.
 He even argues that the ability to interpret human behaviour is shared with animals like dogs.
 Research in the twentieth century has shown that there are two pools of genetic variations,
 Mutation creates new genetic variations, and selection removes these from the pool of expressed variations.
 And the two pools are mixed with each other every generation,
 Out in the savannah it is difficult for a primate with a digestive system like that of man to get its amino acids from the available plant sources.
 And it has serious consequences if you don't do it, right? starvation, malnutrition, and ultimately death.
 The most easily accessible plant resources would have been the proteins in leaves and legumes,
 In contrast, animal foods are not only easily digested,
 Overall, it should not surprise us that our own ancestors solved their own protein problem in a similar way to how the chimpanzees do it in the savanna today.
 And the other is called sleep Onset REM sleep Onset REM is the process of waking up during the normal sleep periods and then falling asleep a short time later.
 This can be done by using a relatively soft alarm clock to gently awaken you,
 If you're someone who imagines the alarm clock in the middle of the night,
 Another biorhythm based possibility is to drink a lot of liquid before going to bed, especially water or tea, which is known for its urine-inducing effect,
 The degree of inner peace that a person possesses, correlates in an inverse way with the degree of tension in body and mind.
 The less tension, the more positive the life force is, and every human being has the potential to find absolute peace and absolute contentment.
 The only thing that stands in the way of enlightenment is our own tension and negativity.
 The Tibetan form of Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha, but has been expanded by the Mahayana path of love and numerous techniques of Indian yoga.
 In principle, Tibetan Buddhism is very simple it consists of Kundalini yoga, meditation, and the path of all-embracing love.
 Kundalini yoga is a system of yoga that awakens the Kundalini energy through yoga postures, breathing exercises,
 At the center of Tibetan meditation is the God-Yoga,
 After the war, Germany and the U S . were at odds,
 Two years after the war, the former Allies were now enemies, and the cold war began.
 It was to last for the next 40 years and would be fought out in proxy wars from North Africa to Afghanistan, Cuba, and many other places.
 On September 17, 1939, the Polish defense had already collapsed completely, and the only hope was in a retreat and a reorganization along the Romanian bridgehead.
 These plans were almost obsolete overnight, however, as over 800,000 soldiers of the Red Army of the Soviet Union,
 The use of ships for the transport of goods is by far the most efficient method of transporting large numbers of people and goods across the oceans.
 The Navy's role has traditionally been to ensure that a country can continue to move people and goods,
 One of the most important examples of this is the North Atlantic campaign during the second World War,
 At the same time, the German Navy was trying to stop this traffic mainly with U-Boats.
 If the Allies had failed,
 Goats were apparently domesticated in the Zagros mountains of Iran about 10,000 years ago.
 Ancient cultures and tribes began to keep them as livestock for their milk, wool, meat, and hides.
 Sheep were usually kept in herds that wandered about on hills or other pasture lands.
 Already in the sixteenth century, in England, they had built supportive rails.
 Although the support rails were only made of parallel wooden boards, they allowed the horses which drew the wagons to travel at higher speeds and to pull heavier loads than on the somewhat rougher roads of the time.
 Soon, thresholds were introduced to secure the position of the rails, but it was soon realised that rails that carried a band of iron were more efficient.
 This became the norm, but the iron caused more wear and tear to the wooden wheels of the wagons.
 And finally, the wooden wheels were replaced by iron wheels.
 The first known mode of transportation was walking.
 Their predecessors, the Australopithecus, did not walk upright as regularly.
 Bipedalism is found in Australopithecus fossils from 4.2 to 3.9 million years ago, although Sahelanthropus may have been bipedal as early as seven million years ago.
 We can live more environmentally friendly, we can join the environmental movement, and we can even become activists,
 In many cases, that's just a symptomatic treatment. If you want to go beyond temporary solutions,
 It is really obvious that the world has changed a lot because of the scientific and technological advancements of mankind,
 After its adoption by the Congress on July four, a handwritten draft, signed by Congress President John Hancock and Secretary Charles Thomson, was sent a few blocks away to the printing press of John Dunlap.
 In the course of the night, between one hundred and fifty and two hundred copies were made,
 The first public reading of the document was given by John Nixon in the courtyard of Independence hall on the eighth of July.
 One was sent to George Washington on July 6, which he read to his troops in New York on July 9,
 The 25 Dunlap-Breitseids that are still in existence are the oldest surviving copies of the document.
 Many Paleontologists believe today that there is a group of dinosaurs that survived and are still living today.
 Many people do not see them as dinosaurs because they have feathers and can fly.
 But many things about birds still look like they do at a dinosaur.
 They have feet with claws and they lay eggs and they walk on their hind legs like a Tyrannosaurus rex.
 Nearly all computers in use today are based on the processing of information that is coded in the form of Binary numbers.
 A Binary number can only have one of two values, namely zero or one, and these numbers are called Binary digits, or Binary digits,
 An internal poisoning may not be immediately apparent,
 The best sign of a poisoning is the presence of an open container of medicine or toxic household chemicals.
 Look on the label for specific first aid instructions for this particular poison.
 The term Wasp is used by entomologists in a formal sense for these insects.
 This term is derived from the ancient familiarity with bed bugs, which are insects that are highly adaptable in their ability to parasitize humans.
 Both the bed bug and the Cimicid bug are nidicol, that is, adapted to living in the nest or the dwelling of their hosts.
 In the United States of America, there are about 400,000 known cases of multiple sclerosis,
 MS is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which is made up of the brain, the spinal cord and the optic nerve.
 Studies have shown that women are twice as likely as men to develop MS.
 A couple may decide that it is not in their own interest or in the interest of their child to raise a baby.
 These couples can choose to adopt a child.
 In the case of adoption, the biological parents give up their parental rights so that another couple can assume parental rights.
 The main goal of science is to use the scientific method to find out how the world works, and that's the basis of most scientific investigations.
 But it's not just about experimenting, where an experiment is a test to rule out one or more of the possible hypotheses.
 And scientists and philosophers concentrated on classical texts,
 Aristotle's views on all the sciences, including psychology, were accepted.
 With the loss of Greek language, the West was cut off from its philosophical and scientific roots in Greece.
 Many observed rhythms in physiology and behavior often rely to a large extent on the presence of endogenous cycles and their production by biological clocks.
 Behavioural patterns that are not only reactions to signals from external cycles are known in most living beings, even in bacteria, fungi, plants and animals.
 Biological clocks are self-sustaining Oscillators that even in the absence of external signals,
 The Hershey-Chase experiment was one of the key pieces of evidence that DNA is a genetic material.
 Hershey and Chase used Phages or viruses to insert their own DNA into a bacterium.
 They took two experiments, in which they either labeled the DNA of the phage with radioactive phosphorus or a protein in the phage with radioactive sulfur.
 Mutations can have a variety of effects, depending on what kind of Mutation it is, what the significance of the piece of genetic material is, and whether it's in the egg or sperm cells.
 Mutations in germ cells can be passed on to children, while mutations elsewhere can lead to cell death or cancer.
 Nature-Based tourism attracts people who are interested in visiting natural areas to enjoy the landscape, including wild plants and animals.
 Examples of on-site activities include hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching, visiting parks, and learning about the ecosystem.
 An example of this is visiting, photographing, and studying orangutans in Borneo.
 Every morning, people leave small provincial towns in their cars to go to their workplaces, and they are passed by others whose workplaces are the places they have just left.
 In this dynamic pendulum, all are in some way connected to and support a private car system.
 The science now points to the fact that this massive carbon economy has taken us out of one of the stable States that have supported human evolution over the last two million years.
 Everyone participates in the society and uses transportation systems.
 In developed countries, you will rarely hear as many complaints about the quality of water or the collapse of bridges.
 Why do transport systems fail,
 Traffic flow is the study of the movement of individual drivers and vehicles between two points and the interactions that take place between them.
 Unfortunately, studying traffic flows is difficult, since one cannot predict driver behavior with one hundred percent certainty.
 Fortunately, drivers tend to behave in a somewhat consistent way, so traffic flows have a certain consistency and can be roughly represented by mathematics.
 To better illustrate the traffic flow, the relationships between the three most important properties were defined as follows:
 These relationships help with the planning, design, and operation of facilities at the roadway.
 Insects were the first animals to conquer the sky, and their ability to fly helped them to escape predators more easily and to find food and mates more efficiently.
 Most insects can fold their wings back along their bodies.
 And this gives them a wider selection of small hiding places in which to hide from predators.
 Today, dragonflies and mayflies are the only insects that cannot fold their wings back.
 For thousands of years, a man named Aristarch claimed that the sun was at the center of the solar system.
 Some people thought he was right, but many believed the opposite that the sun, the planets, and even the stars,
 That seems reasonable, does it not?
 The Amazon is the second longest and the second most water-rich River in the world.
 The Amazon is also the widest River in the world, sometimes as wide as six miles.
 Whole 20 percent of the water that flows into the oceans of the planet comes from the Amazon.
 The Amazon River is 6,387 kilometers long.
 Although the building of stone pyramids continued until the end of the old Kingdom,
 The Egyptians in the ancient new Kingdom marveled at the monuments of their ancestors, who were then about a thousand years old.
 The Vatican city has about eight hundred and sixty people,
 The Vatican city uses Italian for its legislation and official communication.
 Italian is also the everyday language of most people who work in the state, while Latin is often used for religious ceremonies.
 All citizens of Vatican city are Roman Catholic.
 Basic chemical elements like gold, silver and copper have been known to man since antiquity,
 Aristotle, a philosopher, put forth the theory that all things are composed of one or more of four elements,
 This corresponded more to the four Aggregate States, in the same order, solid, liquid, gas, and plasma.
 Alloys are basically a mixture of two or more metals . don't forget there are many elements in the periodic table.
 Elements like calcium and potassium are considered metals, and there are also other metals like silver and gold.
 There are also alloys which contain small amounts of Non-Metallic elements such as carbon.
 The universe consists of matter, and all matter consists of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so tiny that billions of them would fit into the point at the end of this sentence.
 And so, as a result, the pencil became a good friend to many people after its invention.
 Unfortunately, the pencil has been pushed to the background with the advent of newer writing methods, so it has been pushed to the background in its status and in its use.
 Nowadays, people write messages on computer screens without ever having to come close to a typewriter.
 One may be curious to see what will emerge from the keyboard when something new emerges.
 The atomic bomb is based on the principle that you need energy to put together a nucleus with many protons and neutrons.
 It's like rolling a heavy car up a hill,
 Some atoms have unstable nuclei, which means that they will disintegrate at the slightest or even no provocation.
 The surface of the moon consists of rock and dust . The outer layer of the moon is called the crust.
 The crust is about 70 km thick on the near side and about 100 km on the far side.
 It is thinner under the Mare and thicker under the highland.
 On the near side, there could be more Maria, because the crust is thinner, and it was easier for the lava to rise to the surface.
 Theoretical theories concentrate on finding what moves or appeals to people.
 These theories suggest that people have certain needs and or desires that are internalized as they grow up.
 These theories are concerned with what makes certain people want to do the things they do and what influences in their environment make them want to do or not do certain things.
 Two popular content theories are Maslow's hierarchy of needs and Hertzberg's two-factor theory.
 In general, two behaviors can be seen when managers begin to lead their former colleagues.
 This type of manager has problems making unpopular decisions, taking disciplinary action,
 At the other end of the spectrum, you become a different individual,
 Ultimately, the team leader is responsible for the team's success or failure.
 This behavior often leads to conflicts between the leaders and the rest of the team.
 Virtual teams are run according to the same excellence standards as conventional teams, but there are subtle differences.
 Virtual team members often have the function of a contact point for their immediate physical group.
 They often have more autonomy than traditional team members, as their teams can come together in different time zones that may not be considered by the local leadership.
 The presence of a real invisible team is also a unique component of a virtual team.
 The Unseen team is the leadership team, to which every member reports.
 Why would an organization take on the time-consuming process of implementing a learning organization?
 When all available resources are effectively utilized across all functional departments of an organization,
 In the end, the collective work of an organization to overcome an obstacle can lead to a new and innovative method of meeting customer needs.
 Before an organization can be innovative, the leadership must develop a culture of innovation,
 Angel, in 2006, explains the continuum concept as a method to help organizations become more efficient.
 Neurobiological data provide physical evidence for a theoretical approach to the study of cognition,
 The correlation between brain pathology and behavior supports scientists in their research.
 It's been known for a long time that various types of brain damage, such as trauma, injury and tumors,
 Emerging technologies are allowing us to see and to study certain brain structures and processes for the first time.
 It gives us a lot of information and material to build Simulations models that help us to understand what's going on in our head.
 AI is often associated with science fiction, but it is a major branch of computer science that deals with the behavior, learning, and intelligent adaptation of machines.
 Research in the field of ai includes the creation of machines to automate tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 Examples of these include steering, the setting of strategies and time frames, the ability to answer customer questions and queries,
 Such things have become independent disciplines that focus on finding solutions to real life problems.
 Today, ai is often used in the fields of business, medicine, engineering and the military and is also built into a number of software applications for home computers and Video games.
 Excursions are an important part of every school class, and a teacher would like to take her or his students to places that are not accessible by bus.
 Virtual field trips are a technological solution whereby students can view museum pieces,
 A virtual field trip is also a great way to reflect on a trip and share experiences with future classes.
 For example, every year, students at Bennett high school in North Carolina design a Website about their trip to the state capital,
 Blogs can also help students improve their writing skills . At the beginning of their Blogging experience,
 Since students are often a very critical audience, the Blog author makes an effort to improve his writing style to avoid criticism.
 Blogging, he says, also forces students to learn more about the world around them.
 Blogging is a tool that inspires collaboration and encourages students to continue learning well beyond the traditional school day.
 The appropriate use of Blogs can enable students to become more analytical and critical,
 Ottawa is Canada's charming, bilingual capital and is known for a number of art galleries and museums that present Canada's past and present.
 Further south are the Niagara falls, and to the North is the untouched beauty of nature in Muskoka and beyond.
 All of these things and more make Ontario stand out to outsiders as being what is typically considered to be typical of Canada.
 There are large areas further North that are sparsely populated, and some are almost uninhabited wilderness.
 A population comparison that has surprised many,
 The East African Islands are located in the Indian ocean off the East Coast of Africa.
 Madagascar is by far the largest and, in terms of animal life, a continent unto itself.
 Most of the smaller Islands are independent nations or belong to France and are known as luxurious seaside resorts.
 The Arabs also brought Islam to the country, and in the Comoros and Mayotte it has been very successful.
 European influence and Colonization began in the fifteenth century, when the Portuguese sailor Vasco Da Gama discovered the Cape route from Europe to India.
 In the North, the region is bounded by the Sahel zone and in the South and West by the Atlantic ocean.
 It is recommended that all female travelers claim to be married, regardless of their actual family status.
 Wearing a ring is also helpful,
 Women should recognize that cultural differences can lead to what they would consider to be an assault,
 Stay consistent when you turn down men and don't be afraid to defend your point of view.
 The present-day Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the 10th century BC and was used by the Phoenicians, the Romans, and the Merinids as a strategic port with the name Anfa.
 The Portuguese destroyed it and rebuilt it under the name of Casa Branca, only to abandon it after an earthquake in the year 1755.
 The Moroccan Sultan rebuilt the city as Dar el Beida and it was renamed Casablanca by Spanish traders who set up trading posts there.
 Casablanca is one of the most uninteresting places to shop in all of Morocco.
 Around the old Medina, it's easy to find places where traditional Moroccan wares like tagines, pottery, leather goods, water pipes and a whole range of Tinnef are sold, but that's only for the tourists.
 Goma is a tourist town in the Democratic Republic of the Congo in the far East near Rwanda.
 In two thousand and two, Goma was destroyed by the Nyiragongo volcano, which buried most of the city's roads, especially the town center,
 While Goma is reasonably safe, any stay outside of Goma should be carefully planned to learn about the ongoing fighting in the North Kivu province.
 The city is also the starting point for the ascent of the Nyiragongo volcano and for some of the cheapest gorilla tracking tours in Africa.
 You can use Bodabodas to get around Goma. The usual price is around 500 Congolese francs for the short ride.
 This in combination with its relative inaccessibility has led to the term being used as a metaphor for exotic, far-off places.
 Although Timbuktu is known as a tourist attraction and has an airport, it is now a poor town.
 In the year 1990 it was added to the list of endangered world heritage sites.
 It was one of the most important stops on Louis Gates's PBS special, Wonders of the African world.
 The city stands in stark contrast to the rest of the cities of the country, because it has more of an Arabic than an African feel.
 The Kruger National Park is located in the northeast of South Africa, bordering Mozambique to the east, Zimbabwe to the North, and the Crocodile River to the South.
 The park has an area of 19,500 square kilometres and is divided into 14 different Ecozones, each of which supports a different animal world.
 He is one of the main attractions of South Africa and is considered the flagship of South Africa's National Parks.
 Like all South African national parks, it charges a daily conservation fee.
 It may also be worthwhile to buy a wild card, which gives you access to either selected parks in South Africa or to all South African national parks.
 Hong Kong Island is the name of the territory of Hong Kong and is the focus of many tourists.
 The buildings that make up the Hong Kong skyline were compared to a shimmering Balkendiagram,
 For the best view of Hong Kong, you should leave the island and go to the opposite shore of Kowloon.
 The majority of Hong Kong Island's urbanization is dense and packed on newly reclaimed land along the North shore.
 This is the place where the British colonists made their home, and if you're looking for traces of the country's colonial past, this is a good place to start.
 The Sundarbans is the largest Mangrove forest in the world, and it stretches over 80 km from the Bangladeshi and Indian hinterland to the coast.
 The Sundarbans were declared a UNESCO world heritage site, and the part of the forest that lies within the Indian state is called the Sundarbans National Park.
 But the forests are not just Mangrove swamps they also include some of the last remaining patches of the mighty jungle that once covered the Ganges plain.
 The Sundarbans extend over an area of 3,850 square kilometres, of which a third is covered by water and marshes.
 The Sundarbans have been a nature preserve since 1966, and estimates suggest that there are now around 400 Bengal tigers and about 30,000 spotted deer.
 Buses run all day from the district-wide bus station,
 As the buses between the districts are often full, it is advisable to buy a ticket a few days in advance.
 Most of the districts are served by small, comfortable, and stable Japanese Coaster buses.
 Sammeltaxis offer a fast and comfortable way to get to nearby places like Paro and Punakha.
 The Oyapock River Bridge is a suspension bridge that spans the Oyapock River and connects the cities of Oiapoque in Brazil and Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock in French Guiana.
 Their two towers are 83 meters high, their length is 378 meters and they have two lanes with a width of 3.50 meters.
 The clearance height under the bridge is 15 meters, and the construction was completed in August 2011, but the opening to traffic was not until March 2017.
 The bridge is expected to be fully operational by September 2017, and it is expected that the Brazilian customs points will be fully operational by then.
 The Guarani were the most important indigenous group that inhabited the present-day East Paraguay,
 The Chaco region was also the home of other groups of indigenous peoples, such as the Guaycurú and the Payaguá, who survived by hunting, gathering, and fishing.
 Paraguay, formerly called the great province of the West Indies,
 The Spaniards began a three hundred year period of colonization.
 Since the founding of Asuncion in 1537, Paraguay has managed to preserve much of its indigenous character and its identity.
 Argentina is known for having the best polo team and players in the world.
 The biggest tournament of the year takes place in December at Las Cañitas Polo fields.
 Smaller tournaments and matches can also be viewed at other times of the year.
 Information on competitions and sales locations for Polo tickets can be found at the Asociacion Argentina de Polo.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland pound, whose value is fixed in line with the value of the British pound.
 Money can be exchanged at the only bank on the island, which is located across the street from the FIC West store.
 The British pound is generally accepted everywhere on the Islands and at Stanley, and U S . dollars are also frequently accepted.
 On the remote Islands, credit cards are unlikely to be accepted, although British and U S . currency may be accepted,
 It is almost impossible to exchange the currency of the Falkland Islands outside the Islands themselves, so you should exchange the money before you leave the Islands.
 Since Montevideo lies south of the equator, it is summer there when it is winter in the northern hemisphere, and vice versa.
 Montevideo is in the subtropics, and in the summer months, temperatures of over thirty degrees Celsius are common.
 The winter can be deceptively cold: the temperatures rarely go below freezing, but wind and moisture make it feel colder than the thermometer indicates.
 There are no distinctive rainy or dry seasons,
 Although many of the animals in the park are used to seeing people, the wildlife is still wild and should not be fed or disturbed.
 According to the park's guidelines, visitors are to stay at least 100 yards from bears and wolves and 25 yards from all other wildlife.
 No matter how peaceful bison, Wapitis, Elk, bears, and practically all the big animals may appear,
 Dozens of visitors are injured every year because they don't keep enough distance, and these animals are big, wild, and possibly dangerous, so give them enough space.
 Be aware that odors attract bears and other wildlife, so avoid carrying or cooking strongly scented foods, and keep your camping area clean.
 Apia is the capital city of Samoa, located on the island of Upolu, and has a population of just under 40,000.
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and has been the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 The port was the scene of a disgraceful standoff between the Navy in the year 1889, when seven ships from Germany, the United States, and Great Britain refused to leave the port.
 All but one of the ships, a British cruiser, were sunk, and nearly two hundred Americans and Germans were killed.
 During the Mau-Mau-Inspired independence movement, a peaceful rally in the city led to the killing of the top leader, Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III.
 Auckland has two harbours, so there are many beaches,
 The beaches of North Shore, in the North Harbour district, lie on the Pacific ocean and stretch from Long Bay in the North to Devonport in the South.
 Almost all are sandy beaches with safe swimming and most offer shade, provided by Pohutukawa trees.
 The beaches of Tamaki drive are located at the port of Waitemata, in the affluent suburbs of mission Bay and St . Heliers in central Auckland.
 There are family beaches that are sometimes overcrowded, with a nice shopping promenade along the coast,
 The most important local beer is called number one,
 There are many French wines to drink, but the New Zealand and Australian wines are perhaps more palatable.
 The local tap water is safe to drink, but if you're worried, you'll also find bottled water easily available.
 For Australians, the idea of a Flat White is foreign,
 The hot chocolate is Belgian standard, and fruit juices are expensive but excellent.
 Many dives take place all year round and injuries from any of these causes are rare.
 But you should still follow the advice of authorities,
 Jellyfish occur in the vicinity of beaches and near river mouths from October to April,
 Sharks do exist, but they rarely attack humans, most sharks are afraid of people and would swim away.
 Saltwater crocodiles do not live in the sea, their primary habitat is in the estuaries north of Rockhampton.
 A booking in advance gives the traveler the assurance that he will have a place to stay when he arrives at his destination.
 Travel agencies often have deals with specific hotels, although you may also book other accommodation, such as a tent site, through a travel agency.
 Travel agencies usually offer packages that include breakfast, transportation to and from the airport, or even a combination of flight and hotel.
 You can also hold your reservation for you, in case you need time to reconsider or to get additional documents for your destination.
 Any changes or inquiries should be directed first to the travel agency and not directly to the hotel.
 At some festivals, the vast majority of festival goers decide to camp on site, and most festival goers see this as an important part of the experience.
 If you want to be close to the action, you have to get there early to get a camping spot near the music.
 And remember, there's still music playing on some of the other stages until late into the night.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with small children.
 If you're crossing the North Sea in winter, check the position of the cabin, as the breaking of ice can cause a very loud noise for those most affected.
 The cruises to St . Petersburg also offer time for a stay in the city.
 Casinos are usually very careful to keep people as long as possible in the casino,
 They usually have a special offer of food, drinks and entertainment to keep the guests happy and to make sure they stay.
 Some gambling establishments offer alcoholic beverages for free, but intoxication impairs judgment, and all good players know how important it is to stay sober.
 Whoever travels in high latitudes or over mountain passes should reckon with snow, ice and temperatures below freezing.
 On icy and snowy roads, the liability is low and one cannot drive as if one were on bare asphalt.
 In heavy snowfall,
 The visibility can also be reduced by falling or drifting snow or by condensation or ice on the vehicle windows.
 On the other hand, cold and snowy conditions are normal in many countries, and traffic runs uninterruptedly throughout the year.
 Safaris are perhaps the biggest tourist attraction in Africa and the highlight for many visitors.
 The term safari in the usual sense of the word,
 Some animals, like elephants and giraffes, tend to get close to cars, and the standard equipment allows for a good view.
 Lions, cheetahs and Leopards are often shy and you can see them better with a telescope.
 A foot safari, also called a Bushwalk, Footing, or a Wandersafari,
 The Paralympics will be held from August 24 to September 5, 2021, with some events being held at other locations throughout Japan.
 Tokyo will be the only Asian city to have hosted two Olympic summer games,
 If you've already booked your flights and accommodation for the year 2020 before the postponement was announced,
 The cancellation policies vary, but most cancellation policies,
 It is estimated that most tickets for the event will cost between 2,500 and 130,000 yen,
 Drying wet clothes can help them dry faster, and many hotels will lend you an iron and ironing board, even if you're not in the room.
 If no iron is available or one does not wish to wear ironed socks, one can try using a hair dryer if one is available.
 Be careful that the cloth does not get too hot, or it may shrink or cause burns.
 There are different methods of water purification, some of which are more effective in countering certain dangers.
 In some areas, it takes only a minute to boil water, in other areas, it takes several minutes.
 The effectiveness of filters varies greatly, and if you have concerns, then you should consider buying your water in a sealed bottle from a reputable company.
 Travellers may encounter pests that are not known in their home regions.
 Pests can destroy food, cause irritation or, at worst, even cause allergic reactions, poison or transmit diseases.
 Infections as such or dangerous animals that can hurt or kill people are not usually classed as pests.
 Duty-Free shopping is the ability to buy goods that are exempt from duties and consumption taxes at certain locations.
 Travellers whose destination has a high tax rate can sometimes save a considerable amount of money, especially on products like alcoholic beverages and tobacco.
 The section between Point Marion and Fairmount on the Buffalo-Pittsburgh highway is the most challenging,
 If you are not used to driving on highways, stay alert steep grades, narrow lanes and sharp curves are prevalent here.
 The speed limits are considerably lower than in the preceding and following sections,
 But, Interestingly, the cell phone coverage here is much better than in many other parts of the route,
 German baked goods are quite tasty, and in Bavaria they are quite filling and varied, as are those of the neighboring country of Austria.
 Fruit bread is widely available, with apples being baked into bread all year round,
 Many German baked goods also contain almonds, hazelnuts or other nuts.
 If you want to make small but rich pastry, then try what is called Berliner, Pfannkuchen or Krapfen, depending on the region.
 A curry is a dish that is based on herbs and spices, along with either meat or vegetables.
 A curry may be either dry or wet, depending on the amount of liquid used.
 In the interior of North India and Pakistan, yogurt is usually used in curries,
 With a selection of 17,000 Islands, Indonesian cuisine is an umbrella term that encompasses a wide variety of regional cuisines found throughout the country.
 When used without further attributes, however, the term generally refers to the food originally from the central and eastern parts of the main island of Java.
 The cuisine of Java, which is now widespread throughout the island, offers a variety of simply spiced dishes,
 The stirrups are aids for the feet of the rider, which hang down on both sides of the saddle.
 They give the rider more stability, but there are safety concerns because the rider's feet could get caught in them.
 If a rider falls off the horse and gets his foot caught in the stirrup, he can be dragged along if the horse runs.
 First of all, most riders wear riding boots with a heel and a very narrow,
 Some saddles, particularly English saddles, have safety stirrups that allow a stirrup strap to fall off the saddle when it is pulled backward by a rider who falls.
 The Cochamó Valley, Chile's most important climbing destination, known as the Yosemite National Park of South America,
 The peaks offer a breathtaking view, and climbers from all over the world are constantly discovering new routes along the walls, which offer endless possibilities.
 Downhill skiing and snowboarding are popular sports where one attaches skis or a snowboard to one's feet and descends a slope.
 Skiing is a popular holiday activity with many enthusiasts, sometimes known as skiers, who plan their entire holiday around skiing at a particular location.
 The idea of skiing is very old, with cave paintings of skiers dating back to 5000 BC.
 The origins of skiing as a sport go back at least to the seventeenth century, and in eighteen sixty one the first recreational ski club in Australia was opened by Norwegians.
 Skiing with a backpack: This activity is also called ski touring or skiing.
 It is similar to alpine skiing, but does not necessarily include it, as alpine skiing is done in steep and rugged terrain and requires much firmer ski and boots.
 So, let's look at the Skiroute as a comparable hiking route.
 In good conditions, you are able to cover somewhat larger distances than when you are walking on a well-maintained trail.
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but it has a number of independent countries, and you would normally have to apply for a visa several times and go through several passport controls if you wanted to travel through several countries.
 The Schengen area, however, works a little bit like a country in this respect.
 As long as you stay within this zone, you can normally cross the borders without having to go through the passport control again.
 You do not need to apply for a visa to each of the Schengen countries individually, which saves time, money and bureaucracy.
 There is no universally accepted definition of what constitutes an antique.
 The definition has geographic deviations, where the age limit is lower in places like North America than in Europe.
 Handmade products could be called antique, even though they are younger than similar products made by mass production.
 Reindeer herding is an important source of livelihood for the Sámi, and the culture around the trade is also important for many who work in other professions.
 Also in the past, not all Sámi have raised reindeer, but have lived from fishing, hunting and similar things.
 Today, many Sámi work in modern professions, and tourism is an important source of income in Sápmi, the Sámi region.
 Even though the term Gypsy is used primarily by Non-Roma, it is often perceived as being offensive,
 If a travel advisory is issued for the country you are visiting, your travel insurance or travel cancellation insurance may be affected.
 You can also consult the advice of other governments, but their advice is tailored to their own citizens.
 For example, American citizens in the Middle East may be confronted with different situations than Europeans or Arabs.
 The meetings are only a brief summary of the political situation in a country.
 The views presented are often superficial, general, and in comparison to the more detailed information that can be found elsewhere,
 Weather is the umbrella term for any dangerous weather phenomenon with the potential to cause damage, severe social disruption or loss of life.
 Weather can occur anywhere on the planet and there are different types of it, depending on the geography, topography, and atmospheric conditions.
 Strong winds, hail, excessive rainfall and forest fires are forms and effects of a storm, such as a tornado, waterspout,
 Regional and seasonal weather events include blizzards, snowstorms, ice storms, and dust storms.
 Travellers are urged to take note of any and all weather conditions that may affect their travel plans.
 Everyone who plans to travel to a war zone should take professional training for it.
 A search on the Internet for a course on hostile environments will probably show the address of a local company.
 A course will cover all the problems discussed here in much greater detail, usually in combination with practical experience.
 A course is usually between two and five days long and includes role plays, a lot of first aid, and sometimes weapons training.
 There are a number of books and magazines on survival in the wild, but only a few on war zones.
 Travelers who are planning to have a sex change operation abroad must ensure that they have valid travel documents for their return.
 The readiness of governments to issue passports with an unspecified gender,
 The willingness of foreign governments to recognise these documents is also very different.
 The searches at security controls have become much more intrusive since the 11th of September 2001.
 Transgender people should not expect their privacy and dignity to be intact when they pass through the scanners.
 Rip currents are the returning current of waves that break on the shore, often at reefs or similar places.
 Because of the underwater topography, the outflow concentrates in a few deeper areas, and a swift current can form there.
 Most deaths are caused by exhaustion when trying to swim against the current, which can prove to be impossible.
 When you get out of the current, it's not as difficult to swim back as it is normally.
 Try to get somewhere where you will not be caught again, or, if you have been caught,
 The return shock comes earlier than the culture shock,
 It is very difficult for people who have adjusted easily to the new culture,
 When you come back home after a stay abroad, you have adapted to a different culture and dropped some of your home country's habits.
 When you first went abroad, the people were probably patient and understanding because they knew that travelers have to adapt to a new place.
 One might not expect that even returning travelers would need patience and understanding.
 The sound and light show at the pyramids is one of the most interesting attractions for children in the area.
 You can see the pyramids in the dark, and while it's quiet, before the show starts.
 One hears the sounds of tourists and vendors all the time,
 The Sphinx is used as a background and narrator of a long story.
 The scenes are depicted on the Pyramids, with the different Pyramids being illuminated.
 The South Shetland Islands, which were discovered in 1819, are claimed by several countries and have the most stations.
 The archipelago lies 120 km north of the peninsula. The largest is King George Island, with the settlement of Villa Las Estrellas.
 Other Islands are Livingstone Island and Deception Island, where the flooded Caldera of an still active volcano provides a spectacular natural harbor.
 Ellsworthland is the region south of the Bellingshausen Sea,
 The mountains of the peninsula here merge into the plateau and rise again to form the 360 km long chain of the Ellsworth mountains, which is divided by the Minnesota glacier.
 The northern part or the Sentinel range has the highest mountains of Antarctica, the Vinson-Massif, whose highest peak is Mount Vinson,
 In remote areas without a cell phone signal, a satellite phone can be the only option.
 A satellite phone is generally no substitute for a cell phone, because you have to be outdoors and in clear sight of a satellite in order to make a call.
 The service is often used by ships, including pleasure boats, as well as by expeditions that need data and voice connections.
 Your local telephone service provider should be able to give you more information about the service.
 A growing number of people who are planning to take a year off are taking up study and course options abroad.
 This is especially popular with high school graduates, as it allows them to take a year off before going to university.
 In many cases, participation in a study abroad bridge year program can actually improve your chances of getting into a college or university in your home country.
 In general, there is a tuition fee for enrolling in these educational programs.
 Finland is a great place to go boating, and the country has thousands of Islands, both in the lakes and in the coastal archipelagos.
 For the Archipelagoes and Lakes, you don't necessarily need a boat.
 Even though the coastal Island groups and the largest lakes are large enough for any boat,
 Boating is the national pastime in Finland, with every sixth or seventh person owning a boat.
 This is a handful of countries, but it's still quite unique.
 Most pure East Coast cruises include a longer stay in St . Petersburg, Russia.
 You can spend several whole days in the historic town,
 If you only go ashore during the Bordexcursions, you do not need a separate visa.
 Some cruise lines offer Berlin in Germany as a destination in their brochures,
 For people in any age or stage of life, flying can be a daunting experience, especially if they've never flown before or have had a traumatic experience.
 For that, you have to be able to say, I'm not ashamed of my fears and my antipathies,
 To learn more about the workings of airplanes and the procedures during a flight can help some people overcome the fear that is associated with the unknown or with the feeling of not having any control.
 Courier firms are well paid for the speedy delivery of things, and often the time is a very important factor in business documents, commercial goods, or spare parts for urgent repairs.
 On some routes, the larger firms used their own planes, but on other routes and with smaller firms, difficulties arose.
 When they sent things via air freight, the unloading and the customs clearance could take several days on some routes.
 The only way to get it through more quickly was to send it as unaccompanied baggage,
 The obvious way to fly first or business class is to pay a thick wad of money for the privilege,
 That is, not cheap at all: as a rough rule of thumb, you can expect to pay up to four times the normal economy fare,
 In general, it's pointless to look for discounts on direct flights from A to B even for business or first-class seats.
 The airlines know very well that there is a certain core group of people who are willing to pay a certain price for the privilege of getting there quickly and comfortably.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau, and the main language is Romanian, although many people also speak Russian.
 Moldova is a Multi-Ethnic Republic, which has suffered from ethnic conflicts.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the founding of the self-proclaimed Republic of Transnistria in the Eastern part of Moldova, which has its own government and currency, but is not recognized by any UN member state.
 Despite the failure of the political negotiations, the economic relations between these two parts of the Republic of Moldova were restored.
 The most important religion in Moldova is the Christian-Orthodox.
 Izmir is the third largest city in Turkey with a population of about 3.7 million, the second largest port after Istanbul, and a very good transportation Hub.
 The once ancient city of Smyrna is now a modern, progressive, and busy business center,
 The wide boulevards, glazed buildings and modern shopping centers are marked by classic red tile roofs, the market from the eighteenth century as well as old mosques and churches, although the city has more of a Mediterranean atmosphere than that of the traditional Turkey.
 The village of Haldarsvik offers a view of the nearby Island of Eysturoy and has an unusual octagonal church.
 On the cemetery, there are some interesting marble sculptures of pigeons.
 It's worth a half hour stroll through the fascinating village.
 To the North and in the immediate vicinity lies the romantic and fascinating city of Sintra, which was made famous by Lord Byron,
 The Scotturb-Bus 403 runs regularly to Cabo da Roca,
 Also, in the North, visit the great Shrine of Our Lady of Fatima, a place world-famous for its Marian apparitions.
 Please bear in mind that you are visiting a mass grave and a place of great importance to a large part of the world's population.
 There are still many men and women who survived their time here, and many more with relatives who were murdered or worked to death, Jews and Non-Jews alike.
 Please treat this site with the dignity, the reverence, and the respect that it deserves.
 Do not deface the site by graffiti or scratching.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish, with about half of the population speaking Catalan, the vast majority of whom can speak Spanish as well.
 But the majority of the signs are only in Catalan, as it is the first language that is legally established.
 And yet, in public transportation and other institutions,
 Normal announcements are made in Catalan, but unforeseen disruptions are announced in a variety of languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese.
 Parisians are said to be egotistical, rude, and arrogant.
 Even though this is often only a misleading cliché, one finds oneself in Paris at one's best when one acts as if one is well brought up,
 The harsh exterior of the Parisian disappears quite quickly when you show basic manners.
 The National Park of the Plitvice Lakes is heavily wooded, with mainly beech, fir and pine, and offers a mixture of alpine and Mediterranean vegetation.
 It has a great variety of plant communities, thanks to its many microclimates, different soils and varying altitudes.
 The area is also home to a very large variety of animal and bird species.
 There are rare fauna such as European Brown bears, wolves, Eagles, Owls, lynx, wild cats and many generally more common species.
 When visiting the monasteries, women must wear skirts that reach to the knees, and also cover their shoulders.
 In most monasteries there are, of course, Wrapping-Robe for women who come unprepared,
 And so, in the same way, men must wear pants that go over the knee.
 These can also be borrowed from the store, but the clothes are not washed after each user, so you may not feel comfortable in these clothes.
 The cuisine of Mallorca, like that of other Mediterranean areas, is based on bread, vegetables and meat,
 A simple, popular evening meal, especially in the summer, is Pa amb Oli,
 All nouns begin with a capital letter, even in the middle of a sentence.
 This is an important way to distinguish between some verbs and objects.
 It makes reading easier, but writing is somewhat difficult because one has to determine whether a verb or a noun is used as the main word.
 The Italian pronunciation is relatively easy, as most words are pronounced exactly as they are written.
 The most important letters to pay attention to are c and g, as their pronunciation varies depending on the following vowel.
 Also, be careful to distinguish between the two forms of the letter r,
 The Persian language has a relatively simple and for the most part, regular grammar.
 And so, for example, the word for water is a,
 If you speak a Romance language, it's much easier to learn Portuguese.
 People who speak some Spanish might be tempted to think that Portuguese is so similar that you don't have to learn it separately.
 Vintage or modern,
 Since the light pollution during their high phase was not the problem it is today,
 Most of the modern research telescopes are huge, massive,
 The viewing of the cherry blossoms, known as Hanami, has been a part of Japanese culture since the 8th century.
 The concept originated in China, where peach blossoms are the flower of choice.
 In Japan, the first Cherry-Blossom festivals were held by the emperor for himself and other members of the Imperial family.
 Plants look their best in their natural environment, so resist the temptation to remove even one.
 If you visit a formally laid out garden and collect samples, you will also be thrown out without discussion.
 Singapore is generally a very safe place to be in, and after arriving, you can pretty much buy everything.
 Since you are in the extreme Tropics and only a few degrees north of the equator,
 There are also a few buses that go North to Hebron, the traditional burial place of the Biblical patriarchs, Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob,
 Make sure that the bus you are taking goes to Hebron and not just to the nearby Jewish settlement of Kiryat Arba.
 Inland waterways can be a good basis for planning a holiday.
 For example, a tour of the Loire Valley, the Rhine Valley, or a cruise to interesting cities on the Danube River or a boat ride along the Erie Canal.
 They are also popular hiking and biking routes.
 In Christianity, Christmas is one of the most important holidays and is considered the birthday of Jesus.
 Many of the traditions around the holiday have also been adopted by Non-Believers in Christian and Non-Christian countries.
 There is a tradition of spending Easter morning at some open place to watch the sunrise.
 There are of course Christian theological explanations for this tradition, but it could also be a pre-Christian spring and fertility ritual.
 Traditional churches often hold an Easter Vigil on Easter Saturday,
 All the animals that originally came to the Islands,
 Due to the great distance from the continent, mammals were unable to make the journey,
 Since the first humans entered the Galapagos Islands,
 When you visit the Arctic or Antarctic regions in the winter, you will experience the polar night,
 This offers a good opportunity to see the northern lights, as the sky is more or less dark all around the clock.
 Because the areas are sparsely populated and the light pollution is often not a problem,
 The Japanese work culture is more hierarchical and formal than what Westerners may be used to.
 Suits are part of the business attire, and colleagues address each other by their last names or job titles.
 The harmony at work is of the utmost importance, with the focus being on the group's performance rather than on individual achievements.
 Often, workers have to seek the approval of their bosses for all the decisions they make,
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.30193734857115684, 'precisions': [0.6778862335913833, 0.4319433914581754, 0.29499813562030575, 0.2046618996678115], 'brevity_penalty': 0.8280505632219167, 'length_ratio': 0.8412685570972048, 'translation_length': 20797, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 55.17608955590122, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2} results comet:{'mean_score': 0.8262146831206654, 'scores': [0.7641857266426086, 0.7739080190658569, 0.8701088428497314, 0.5169371366500854, 0.7582111358642578, 0.7802568078041077, 0.9181907176971436, 0.7845036387443542, 0.8507643342018127, 0.9410011172294617, 0.7518339157104492, 0.8961948752403259, 0.6584784388542175, 0.8856244683265686, 0.8579928874969482, 0.8423033952713013, 0.7831467986106873, 0.8506066203117371, 0.8830552697181702, 0.8339731693267822, 0.881226122379303, 0.8905067443847656, 0.8807750344276428, 0.7999712228775024, 0.5671853423118591, 0.8996228575706482, 0.8462436199188232, 0.7805988192558289, 0.8560588955879211, 0.9399998784065247, 0.5961036086082458, 0.7136802077293396, 0.8034104704856873, 0.9051406383514404, 0.9304322004318237, 0.7671208381652832, 0.7757679224014282, 0.8502775430679321, 0.8377711772918701, 0.8553845286369324, 0.8790678381919861, 0.913757860660553, 0.8484807014465332, 0.8722367882728577, 0.8110639452934265, 0.5539936423301697, 0.8087248802185059, 0.9176698327064514, 0.9134986996650696, 0.891040563583374, 0.8999690413475037, 0.8366919159889221, 0.8895601034164429, 0.8622881174087524, 0.9172811508178711, 0.5238829851150513, 0.8238611221313477, 0.8151518106460571, 0.8777981400489807, 0.951173722743988, 0.847113311290741, 0.9227511882781982, 0.8810991048812866, 0.6640421748161316, 0.8408789038658142, 0.7841445803642273, 0.8716859817504883, 0.8500691652297974, 0.9052429795265198, 0.8699750900268555, 0.9126191735267639, 0.5951736569404602, 0.8471099734306335, 0.8776559233665466, 0.8661009669303894, 0.47419634461402893, 0.7783344984054565, 0.9196327328681946, 0.8636162877082825, 0.8570356369018555, 0.7671180367469788, 0.9006544947624207, 0.8424349427223206, 0.8152710795402527, 0.7900218963623047, 0.8211240768432617, 0.6375404000282288, 0.9116842150688171, 0.9321421980857849, 0.8909222483634949, 0.7197826504707336, 0.8657068014144897, 0.8211200833320618, 0.9248112440109253, 0.7454149127006531, 0.9128857254981995, 0.8111985325813293, 0.886714518070221, 0.8301705718040466, 0.8588120937347412, 0.9301887154579163, 0.7414184212684631, 0.9023184180259705, 0.9729158282279968, 0.8902839422225952, 0.7196794152259827, 0.911197304725647, 0.8825992345809937, 0.625822126865387, 0.8783119916915894, 0.9129171371459961, 0.9268912672996521, 0.9485722780227661, 0.9151059985160828, 0.7021891474723816, 0.7996553778648376, 0.895991861820221, 0.7980362772941589, 0.9795842170715332, 0.8053887486457825, 0.38996896147727966, 0.7874049544334412, 0.781192421913147, 0.9084013104438782, 0.9102088809013367, 0.6268072724342346, 0.90071040391922, 0.8905760645866394, 0.896565854549408, 0.9317452311515808, 0.7160161137580872, 0.9032060503959656, 0.6329706311225891, 0.8864562511444092, 0.8779781460762024, 0.8420534729957581, 0.8136427998542786, 0.8677781820297241, 0.9401928782463074, 0.8156098127365112, 0.8850297927856445, 0.7237754464149475, 0.9189398288726807, 0.8998674154281616, 0.90473872423172, 0.7814766764640808, 0.6528629660606384, 0.9287289381027222, 0.9108160138130188, 0.9085306525230408, 0.6620794534683228, 0.6090017557144165, 0.7477637529373169, 0.8010542988777161, 0.6832500696182251, 0.8857918977737427, 0.8512974381446838, 0.7583848834037781, 0.8617106080055237, 0.9132442474365234, 0.7998337149620056, 0.6488597989082336, 0.7911085486412048, 0.6434863209724426, 0.8555199503898621, 0.7921844720840454, 0.8813099265098572, 0.6278451085090637, 0.8526210784912109, 0.7940617203712463, 0.8087440729141235, 0.9061954021453857, 0.8302526473999023, 0.8698248863220215, 0.8825020790100098, 0.9264399409294128, 0.8383849263191223, 0.6702023148536682, 0.9396305680274963, 0.9339272379875183, 0.7541189193725586, 0.903361976146698, 0.8639016151428223, 0.8731926679611206, 0.8932837247848511, 0.9276158213615417, 0.9751046299934387, 0.9029870629310608, 0.8879799842834473, 0.6443545818328857, 0.8248597383499146, 0.6206698417663574, 0.8726961016654968, 0.8227590918540955, 0.8889725804328918, 0.9332067370414734, 0.5320950746536255, 0.7577446103096008, 0.896407425403595, 0.8115394711494446, 0.7840633988380432, 0.8287743926048279, 0.7311631441116333, 0.7521153092384338, 0.8805809617042542, 0.8927819728851318, 0.8461195230484009, 0.8805331587791443, 0.8100008368492126, 0.8997395634651184, 0.9259510636329651, 0.8997230529785156, 0.9386504292488098, 0.7471491694450378, 0.8545892834663391, 0.8277190327644348, 0.8917924165725708, 0.895764172077179, 0.8888711929321289, 0.9213560819625854, 0.946627676486969, 0.8621641993522644, 0.7500081658363342, 0.7675208449363708, 0.9335041642189026, 0.8966379761695862, 0.7132556438446045, 0.8725864291191101, 0.9103887677192688, 0.8238368630409241, 0.8389381766319275, 0.8931358456611633, 0.8121292591094971, 0.8755449652671814, 0.48515138030052185, 0.8882902264595032, 0.8926144242286682, 0.8833970427513123, 0.9401164650917053, 0.90349280834198, 0.7814850211143494, 0.7256413102149963, 0.7191587090492249, 0.7769149541854858, 0.8723911643028259, 0.8471580147743225, 0.8191085457801819, 0.5146281719207764, 0.5800586342811584, 0.9426038861274719, 0.9053128957748413, 0.9201982617378235, 0.9220615029335022, 0.9244163632392883, 0.9334120750427246, 0.8888381123542786, 0.9135556817054749, 0.7697325348854065, 0.8932956457138062, 0.8927082419395447, 0.9150546193122864, 0.7499816417694092, 0.8105153441429138, 0.8074178099632263, 0.9046763777732849, 0.6051439642906189, 0.6691728234291077, 0.865487277507782, 0.9406132102012634, 0.9090027213096619, 0.899304211139679, 0.7658628225326538, 0.7642428874969482, 0.8372249603271484, 0.6609079241752625, 0.6084981560707092, 0.6577457189559937, 0.9281918406486511, 0.5482212901115417, 0.9412518739700317, 0.9119558930397034, 0.7186557650566101, 0.9105375409126282, 0.915421187877655, 0.9066134095191956, 0.9401131868362427, 0.8781595826148987, 0.7290000319480896, 0.9007946848869324, 0.5510083436965942, 0.7763814330101013, 0.8289217352867126, 0.8918207883834839, 0.8753539323806763, 0.5211560130119324, 0.7071216702461243, 0.6123383045196533, 0.8791206479072571, 0.9435768723487854, 0.849129855632782, 0.9379259943962097, 0.879149854183197, 0.85324627161026, 0.8751758933067322, 0.6779018640518188, 0.7917535901069641, 0.8129308819770813, 0.8246877789497375, 0.9181337952613831, 0.9191038012504578, 0.9121971726417542, 0.9124966859817505, 0.9214040637016296, 0.7243024706840515, 0.9519791007041931, 0.8670424818992615, 0.8670037984848022, 0.846992552280426, 0.901290774345398, 0.9670615792274475, 0.5138105750083923, 0.662152886390686, 0.8905513882637024, 0.5296785831451416, 0.9031673669815063, 0.8307681083679199, 0.6700405478477478, 0.8663952350616455, 0.9014079570770264, 0.8864145874977112, 0.9195975661277771, 0.6061193346977234, 0.9249158501625061, 0.8061251044273376, 0.9258399605751038, 0.8961727023124695, 0.7100065350532532, 0.8047888875007629, 0.8138976693153381, 0.88993901014328, 0.6341506838798523, 0.8441107869148254, 0.884949266910553, 0.6476205587387085, 0.7739283442497253, 0.7778981328010559, 0.8923513293266296, 0.6833611130714417, 0.9098606705665588, 0.7898039817810059, 0.7907053232192993, 0.8852748274803162, 0.7249480485916138, 0.9526713490486145, 0.9297387003898621, 0.9044458270072937, 0.8995169401168823, 0.7447941303253174, 0.9102504849433899, 0.8613981604576111, 0.6301199793815613, 0.8985493779182434, 0.9250863790512085, 0.7645275592803955, 0.8488886952400208, 0.7332045435905457, 0.8279072642326355, 0.7238873839378357, 0.7454679608345032, 0.7653931975364685, 0.8265672326087952, 0.5703420639038086, 0.6026331782341003, 0.9050597548484802, 0.7955140471458435, 0.9232792854309082, 0.891649067401886, 0.7784243822097778, 0.8333966135978699, 0.9044348001480103, 0.8179517388343811, 0.8758615851402283, 0.6650436520576477, 0.8234516382217407, 0.7369330525398254, 0.8329797387123108, 0.7679654359817505, 0.7573927044868469, 0.6487814784049988, 0.8790485262870789, 0.9000164866447449, 0.8710431456565857, 0.8964141011238098, 0.9510148763656616, 0.8962966799736023, 0.9195287823677063, 0.6757656931877136, 0.9568299651145935, 0.7292444109916687, 0.9354200959205627, 0.9061222076416016, 0.8016603589057922, 0.8241609930992126, 0.6897597908973694, 0.7766585350036621, 0.8353810906410217, 0.9058859348297119, 0.7735252380371094, 0.8108556866645813, 0.8648995757102966, 0.8837555050849915, 0.7960991859436035, 0.8137862086296082, 0.9239243865013123, 0.46297672390937805, 0.7107981443405151, 0.8696328997612, 0.8984488248825073, 0.8730650544166565, 0.8990547060966492, 0.9352362155914307, 0.8737817406654358, 0.8382002115249634, 0.8564035296440125, 0.5002050399780273, 0.8374833464622498, 0.6174787282943726, 0.8986424207687378, 0.933861494064331, 0.3917779326438904, 0.890095055103302, 0.8679115176200867, 0.850236177444458, 0.8670765161514282, 0.636956512928009, 0.6670833230018616, 0.8405928611755371, 0.8632198572158813, 0.9030428528785706, 0.7829387187957764, 0.8848900198936462, 0.9159830808639526, 0.9678491353988647, 0.9023008942604065, 0.8707713484764099, 0.8966531157493591, 0.8744853138923645, 0.7149813175201416, 0.6806855201721191, 0.7672362923622131, 0.7108480334281921, 0.7831675410270691, 0.9101781845092773, 0.7723848819732666, 0.8083748817443848, 0.8630457520484924, 0.7818912863731384, 0.9078142046928406, 0.8214724659919739, 0.8654371500015259, 0.9344547390937805, 0.7473636269569397, 0.7742026448249817, 0.8829554915428162, 0.8781125545501709, 0.749793529510498, 0.8924195170402527, 0.691778838634491, 0.7187936902046204, 0.3828074634075165, 0.7561133503913879, 0.5651034116744995, 0.8769742846488953, 0.8562803864479065, 0.7274405360221863, 0.8528066277503967, 0.8309124708175659, 0.6881222128868103, 0.9205411076545715, 0.796630322933197, 0.7939409017562866, 0.7589961886405945, 0.8348667621612549, 0.8340491652488708, 0.750153124332428, 0.8956928849220276, 0.689348042011261, 0.6298547387123108, 0.6161927580833435, 0.8628981709480286, 0.8682740926742554, 0.8582058548927307, 0.9362273812294006, 0.9072169661521912, 0.7450010776519775, 0.6530687212944031, 0.857431948184967, 0.8973759412765503, 0.9250744581222534, 0.9212103486061096, 0.8504012227058411, 0.9147351980209351, 0.895622968673706, 0.8632727265357971, 0.5402968525886536, 0.8685182929039001, 0.6663203835487366, 0.6205751299858093, 0.8936270475387573, 0.8936164975166321, 0.7500188946723938, 0.5652071237564087, 0.8720007538795471, 0.8825003504753113, 0.8491451144218445, 0.9468463659286499, 0.8156452775001526, 0.8445499539375305, 0.860487163066864, 0.8689448237419128, 0.8005170226097107, 0.7063402533531189, 0.8958893418312073, 0.8046719431877136, 0.8772438764572144, 0.8686687350273132, 0.9257574677467346, 0.578714907169342, 0.8830070495605469, 0.7731602787971497, 0.6970852613449097, 0.6420201659202576, 0.8547330498695374, 0.7116424441337585, 0.8098588585853577, 0.5074719190597534, 0.813808023929596, 0.8690854907035828, 0.9035570621490479, 0.8679857850074768, 0.8812142610549927, 0.9284965395927429, 0.8098472952842712, 0.5870515704154968, 0.6473539471626282, 0.926302969455719, 0.8434373140335083, 0.8828524947166443, 0.4813846945762634, 0.91268390417099, 0.7042316794395447, 0.8300262093544006, 0.9050993323326111, 0.5655409693717957, 0.8957000374794006, 0.8447172045707703, 0.6597440838813782, 0.7638978362083435, 0.8591373562812805, 0.8379879593849182, 0.9083958268165588, 0.7728240489959717, 0.5736004114151001, 0.9098565578460693, 0.871178925037384, 0.8378071188926697, 0.770610511302948, 0.7462772727012634, 0.8885987997055054, 0.5527582764625549, 0.9198769927024841, 0.8642908930778503, 0.7578033208847046, 0.8142967820167542, 0.9327633380889893, 0.6558961272239685, 0.8347712159156799, 0.9113281965255737, 0.7419584393501282, 0.7145668268203735, 0.8961216807365417, 0.9397266507148743, 0.8740798234939575, 0.9034324288368225, 0.7631606459617615, 0.7052591443061829, 0.9421133995056152, 0.9151765704154968, 0.9242997765541077, 0.8784626722335815, 0.8926379680633545, 0.9017888903617859, 0.7895257472991943, 0.7840951681137085, 0.9181589484214783, 0.8749962449073792, 0.9180717468261719, 0.8283989429473877, 0.7754138112068176, 0.9161379933357239, 0.8958357572555542, 0.8900018334388733, 0.8045830130577087, 0.916477620601654, 0.9137241244316101, 0.9452663064002991, 0.83938068151474, 0.8397888541221619, 0.7138661742210388, 0.8140887022018433, 0.835697591304779, 0.9029682874679565, 0.6152952909469604, 0.9001027941703796, 0.9187689423561096, 0.9166956543922424, 0.8053448796272278, 0.935839831829071, 0.9131415486335754, 0.8418964147567749, 0.8990561366081238, 0.8904735445976257, 0.8152530789375305, 0.7630887031555176, 0.5921836495399475, 0.8258242011070251, 0.9303818345069885, 0.9245961308479309, 0.7589794993400574, 0.7154766917228699, 0.8660424947738647, 0.44879984855651855, 0.9421008825302124, 0.94817054271698, 0.978887140750885, 0.7774434685707092, 0.7937619090080261, 0.7479755878448486, 0.9159421920776367, 0.9487884640693665, 0.8925806283950806, 0.9294971823692322, 0.8555031418800354, 0.852372944355011, 0.7510932683944702, 0.86775141954422, 0.7841542363166809, 0.8851792216300964, 0.5951955318450928, 0.8479589819908142, 0.9025786519050598, 0.9353556632995605, 0.8829153180122375, 0.8614150881767273, 0.8767245411872864, 0.9226713180541992, 0.9029259085655212, 0.90257728099823, 0.7445271015167236, 0.7476395964622498, 0.5593305826187134, 0.9086437821388245, 0.9318981766700745, 0.913817822933197, 0.9577697515487671, 0.8888724446296692, 0.7486963868141174, 0.7888325452804565, 0.8450189232826233, 0.7800763249397278, 0.8927276730537415, 0.8395791053771973, 0.867838442325592, 0.7787775993347168, 0.9434510469436646, 0.7527221441268921, 0.8757646083831787, 0.8840530514717102, 0.9110073447227478, 0.9069622159004211, 0.7455743551254272, 0.9543259143829346, 0.8513912558555603, 0.8415000438690186, 0.687338650226593, 0.9222498536109924, 0.7548303604125977, 0.7089556455612183, 0.8945102095603943, 0.7977064251899719, 0.9477899074554443, 0.7303474545478821, 0.9287070631980896, 0.8927835822105408, 0.8523321151733398, 0.9376748204231262, 0.5317476391792297, 0.9292435050010681, 0.863552987575531, 0.9146419167518616, 0.8641828894615173, 0.8968066573143005, 0.9306768774986267, 0.8718462586402893, 0.6214126944541931, 0.788605272769928, 0.759469211101532, 0.9120742678642273, 0.9353837370872498, 0.9014766216278076, 0.9359117150306702, 0.8281465172767639, 0.9212788343429565, 0.7847517132759094, 0.9027082324028015, 0.88803631067276, 0.8448054194450378, 0.863718569278717, 0.898766815662384, 0.8073474168777466, 0.9070704579353333, 0.9019131064414978, 0.8606299757957458, 0.8884427547454834, 0.8368508219718933, 0.9018385410308838, 0.8871555328369141, 0.8406462669372559, 0.710992157459259, 0.8893094062805176, 0.8715782761573792, 0.9043254852294922, 0.8345274329185486, 0.8944564461708069, 0.8913626074790955, 0.8801972270011902, 0.8668565154075623, 0.5669865012168884, 0.9132499098777771, 0.8963854312896729, 0.8115701079368591, 0.8592128157615662, 0.8878485560417175, 0.9028204679489136, 0.8643164038658142, 0.7500781416893005, 0.9229031205177307, 0.504366397857666, 0.8695200085639954, 0.9283527135848999, 0.9348583817481995, 0.9111704230308533, 0.903213381767273, 0.8734295964241028, 0.8355494141578674, 0.9029234051704407, 0.8152819275856018, 0.8070216178894043, 0.8738035559654236, 0.9207654595375061, 0.928866446018219, 0.9428303837776184, 0.8114821314811707, 0.9193372130393982, 0.8813484311103821, 0.6578372120857239, 0.9018853306770325, 0.9097070097923279, 0.9254616498947144, 0.9683462381362915, 0.8752145171165466, 0.9104740023612976, 0.8610665202140808, 0.7702539563179016, 0.9179288148880005, 0.9115894436836243, 0.8208273649215698, 0.820506751537323, 0.6124348044395447, 0.8556032180786133, 0.8827276229858398, 0.42880070209503174, 0.9151226878166199, 0.7906785607337952, 0.6596249938011169, 0.7293748259544373, 0.9344812035560608, 0.9113081693649292, 0.8885083794593811, 0.8838669061660767, 0.915289044380188, 0.8283095359802246, 0.8890969157218933, 0.8972366452217102, 0.9142847061157227, 0.7899528741836548, 0.9687204360961914, 0.8166871666908264, 0.7381751537322998, 0.668206512928009, 0.8818763494491577, 0.8714095950126648, 0.8683860898017883, 0.8107700943946838, 0.4940243065357208, 0.9051867127418518, 0.9140217304229736, 0.9525771141052246, 0.5166028141975403, 0.9003824591636658, 0.8905735611915588, 0.7009797692298889, 0.9237868189811707, 0.8516332507133484, 0.8389773368835449, 0.51948082447052, 0.8283654451370239, 0.8383380770683289, 0.8517026901245117, 0.8464065194129944, 0.9069833755493164, 0.8824682235717773, 0.9212899208068848, 0.8998398780822754, 0.9267006516456604, 0.868625819683075, 0.8840528130531311, 0.9028595089912415, 0.7996767163276672, 0.8390920758247375, 0.6661695837974548, 0.7621424794197083, 0.8233658075332642, 0.6417779326438904, 0.8060392737388611, 0.8565359115600586, 0.9393146634101868, 0.9090865254402161, 0.7044522166252136, 0.8969560861587524, 0.9052117466926575, 0.6664197444915771, 0.8462616801261902, 0.8945215344429016, 0.7130476236343384, 0.7745386362075806, 0.83922278881073, 0.7077397108078003, 0.8557583093643188, 0.832868754863739, 0.8802796006202698, 0.9212720990180969, 0.8432400822639465, 0.8042638897895813, 0.8120650053024292, 0.7194041609764099, 0.6776266694068909, 0.8669390082359314, 0.775263786315918, 0.9283633828163147, 0.8687970638275146, 0.7196388244628906, 0.8997560143470764, 0.8906568884849548, 0.8978822231292725, 0.784979522228241, 0.8982481956481934, 0.7337315678596497, 0.9019584059715271, 0.8721182942390442, 0.9232524037361145, 0.859359085559845, 0.8526282906532288, 0.8718141913414001, 0.8883866667747498, 0.790171205997467, 0.9321399927139282, 0.8463311195373535, 0.8763033747673035, 0.8466480374336243, 0.9256908893585205, 0.9164453148841858, 0.8787966370582581, 0.8771736025810242, 0.6882100701332092, 0.8568618297576904, 0.852714478969574, 0.9069977402687073, 0.820249617099762, 0.8642191290855408, 0.8930392861366272, 0.8572564721107483, 0.734560489654541, 0.599159300327301, 0.765846312046051, 0.8886281847953796, 0.9105530977249146, 0.8065356612205505, 0.9287657141685486, 0.8640722036361694, 0.7164289355278015, 0.899560272693634, 0.7692134976387024, 0.8232000470161438, 0.9384471774101257, 0.8718706965446472, 0.8224125504493713, 0.8632497191429138, 0.8606669306755066, 0.9254431128501892, 0.9013491868972778, 0.8846263885498047, 0.9199749827384949, 0.8309665322303772, 0.8834448456764221, 0.8878247737884521, 0.9273350834846497, 0.8520442843437195, 0.804530143737793, 0.7068189382553101, 0.8885401487350464, 0.5442441701889038, 0.8308172225952148, 0.6306495070457458, 0.84476637840271, 0.6108541488647461, 0.8888114094734192, 0.5760062336921692, 0.8643394112586975, 0.8655364513397217, 0.8866154551506042, 0.8989327549934387, 0.7429905533790588, 0.8237816095352173, 0.7940447926521301, 0.8911529183387756, 0.8977818489074707, 0.9246891140937805, 0.9217472672462463, 0.9166771769523621, 0.8939545154571533, 0.9167076349258423, 0.9271860718727112, 0.8084291815757751, 0.8662267327308655, 0.9109063744544983, 0.8008947968482971, 0.9166420102119446, 0.8179848790168762, 0.8273760676383972, 0.855337381362915, 0.8721556663513184, 0.87938392162323, 0.7755791544914246, 0.8843874335289001, 0.8839271664619446, 0.8628914952278137, 0.6076752543449402, 0.8577656745910645, 0.9281623959541321, 0.6170055866241455, 0.8363513350486755, 0.9102079272270203, 0.8978490233421326, 0.9603486657142639, 0.7962777018547058, 0.8965439200401306, 0.5169488191604614, 0.832882285118103, 0.7428422570228577, 0.8275747895240784, 0.647081196308136, 0.7840307354927063, 0.970180094242096, 0.8266253471374512, 0.9185498356819153, 0.8727084994316101, 0.5850613117218018, 0.9277738332748413, 0.3751193583011627, 0.8188014030456543, 0.8535434603691101, 0.45129427313804626, 0.6410335898399353, 0.7383555769920349, 0.9111526012420654, 0.9098617434501648, 0.8355721831321716, 0.8739151358604431, 0.7667795419692993, 0.8703069090843201, 0.6907785534858704, 0.8781618475914001, 0.9169450402259827, 0.905047595500946, 0.8555084466934204, 0.8882229924201965, 0.9321500658988953, 0.8871179819107056, 0.835624635219574, 0.9215494990348816, 0.6526269316673279, 0.5920407176017761, 0.6648485064506531, 0.4983275830745697, 0.7726142406463623, 0.8424385190010071, 0.8130142092704773, 0.9480177760124207, 0.9077296853065491, 0.8432588577270508, 0.8157546520233154]}